Authors
Jason Wallis
Number of Reviews
41

Title
Review for Tell Your Children (1936)
Up until a couple hours ago, I was completely convinced that Ed Wood's
"Glen or Glenda?" was the stupidest, most inane movie ever made. Well,
earlier today I decided to take a trip down to my local friendly Hollywood
Video to pick up some flicks. Looking in the cult classics section, a film
called "Reefer Madness" caught my eye. I thought it was like a Cheech and
Chong flick or something. So I read the box and discovered that it was a
short made in the 30s that was meant to warn families about the dangers of
marijuana addiction. So I figured, "What the hell? It might be good for a
laugh or two." 
Well, a little over an hour later, I was trying to catch my breathe because
I was laughing so hard. "Reefer Madness" (originally titled "Tell Your
Children") is the single worst film ever made, but it is also one of the
most entertaining (unintentually, of course). 
The "film", shall we call it, opens with a warning - "The film you are
about to see may disturb you." Well, it does, but not in the way that they
meant. What's disturbing about it is that someone actually thought it was
good enough to get produced. 
The plot deals with a group of kids that hang out at the apartment of a
chick named Mae and get high together on pot. Mae's boyfriend/husband (not
sure which) is their supplier. I'm not going to bore you with anymore of
the story line. You just gotta watch it. 
Very rarely does a film come along that I think warrents the dreaded zero
stars rating (other recipients include "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre" and
"New York Stories", by the way), but this movie truly deserves it. The fact
that it's funny as hell doesn't alter this because the only reason it funny
is because it's just so bad. 
So I guess I actually recommend "Reefer Madness" for the simple fact that
it made me bust a gut watching it. Louis J. Gasnier has made a film that
joins the ranks of "Plan 9 from Outer Space" and "Santa Claus Conquers the
Martians" as great flicks to watch when you're in the mood for some really
bad camp classics. 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
"Scream 2" * * * 
Starring Neve Campbell, David Arquette, Courtney Cox, Liev Schreiber, Sarah
Michelle Geller, Jamie Kennedy and Laurie Metcalf 
Directed by Wes Craven 
Warning: This review reveals the endings of "Scream" and "I Know What You
Did Last Summer". If you have not seen these films, skip paragraph number
six. 
"Scream 2" has an opening very similar to that of the now classic orginal
"Scream". A couple (Jada Pincket and some other guy) are waiting in line to
see the new movie "Stab", based on the book written by media mongul Gale
Whethers which in itself was based on the murders that took place in the
first "Scream". Everyone in the theater is dressed up in that cool mask
that the killer wore in the first one, going around with glow-in-the-dark
butcher knives pretending to stab each other. The guy goes to take a piss
and wham!; is stabbed right through the ear. Then good ol' Jada is murdered
in the middle of the crowded theater. But, of course, no one notices
because the whole place is packed wall to wall with screaming fans. 
However, unlike the original's beginning sequence, this scene is not
handled very tastefully. In the first one, you had the caller playing a
brilliantly scripted cat-and-mouse game with Drew Barrymore. Here, the
victims are just brutally slautered. I hate to say this, but (although in a
sick way), it was actually fun to see the killer torment poor Drew. At
least that was suspenseful. This is just mindless gore. 
It turns out that the couple attended the same college as Sidney Presott
(Neve Campbell) and Randy (Jamie Kennedy), both survivors from the original
film. Sid is now majoring in drama and is the star of a school play and
Randy is again the film geek, this time attending film classes. 
Before I go on with the rest of the plot, I just have to talk about the
conversation that takes place in Randy's film class. They are discussing
sequels and how they always suck when compared to the first ones. I'm
mentioning this because it, unlike most of the rest of the flick, is very
smartly written. It has the same self-aware feel to it that made the first
one the great movie that it is. And why do I consider it cleverly written?
Because of the simple fact that I was anticipating what each character
would say next. The rest of the movie (save the brilliant ending) is mostly
very predictable and offers few surprises. It may just be me, but I really
dug this scene and think it's one of the best scenes in the whole flick. 
Anyway, back to the story. Needless to say, when Sid is informed about the
recent murders, she totally freaks out and begins to fear for her life.
Rightfully so, because soon the corpses start pilling up and (in the words
of Randy), everybody's a suspect. 
So who is it this time? Who is the real killer (or killers, maybe)? Could
it be Dewey (David Arquette), the now disabled bumbling cop from the first
one? I mean, his sister was murdered; isn't it possible that he's out for
revenge? Speaking of revenge, what about Cotton Weary (Liev Schreiber, in
by far the best performance of the film), the man that Sidney wrongfully
testified against for the murder of her mother? Ever since people haven't
looked at him the same way. Even though his innocence has been proven, his
life will never, ever be the same again. Of course, you can't negate the
possibility that it could actually be Gale Whethers. Maybe she wants to
have another killing frenzy so she could write another book. I mean, the
writer of "Scream 2" has pulled almost every trick in the book; in
"Scream", it was revealed that there were actually two killers. In "I Know
What You Did Last Summer", the real killer was never unmasked. Is it
possible that this time, the surprise is that the killer is a woman, like
in "Friday the 13th"? 
Well, there's no way in hell I'm going to reveal the identity of the
killer, but I will say that I guessed the ending (sorta). It was pretty
easy too, but I didn't guess everything. You kind of have to see the flick
to know what I'm talking about. 
But just because this is not anywhere near as good as it's predessessor,
when judged on it's own merit, it's basically a good movie with one of the
best endings of the nineties. So I'm going to give this one a marginal
thumbs up. Don't expect anything great, though. Of course, there's always
"Scream 3"... 
Oh, and a word of warning to those of us with weak stomachs; this sucker's
gory. And I'm talking about throat slicings, brains, shots to the head, the
works. It's not really that bad, but if you're expecting mild violence as
in the original, look elsewhere. Just thought I'd warn ya. 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Babe: Pig in the City (1998)
Starring Elizabeth Daily, Magda Szubanski, James Cromwell, Mary Stein,
Danny Mann, Glenne Headly, Steven 
Wright, James Cosmo, Adam Goldberg and Mickey Rooney 
Directed by George Miller 
Rated G, but contains some scary situations 
Theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1 
Released in 1998 
Running 97 minutes 
The original Babe gets my vote as the best family film since The Princess
Bride, and it's sequel has been getting rave reviews from most internet
critics, both Siskel and Ebert sighting it more than a month ago as one of
the year's finest films. So, naturally, when I entered the screening room
that was to be showing the movie and there was nary another viewer to be
found, this notion left me puzzled. It is a rare thing for a children's
movie to be praised this highly, so wouldn't you think that every parent in
the entire city would be flocking with their kids to see this supposedly
"magical" piece of work? A tad bewildered, but pleased to not have to worry
about screaming kids and other disruptions that commonly go along with
family films, I sat back for 97 minutes and watched intently and with a
very open mind, having great expectations for the film. Looking back, I
should have taken the hint and left right when I entered the theater. 
Believe me; I wanted to like Babe: Pig in the City. The plot seemed
interesting enough; after the events that took place in the original, Babe
the sheep-pig has become a legitimate national phenomenon. But after a
fateful encounter with a water well, Arthur Hogget (James Cromwell, who the
movie could have used alot more of) has been rendered bed-ridden for a
number of weeks and the farm begins to go under financially. The only
solution that his wife (Magda Szubanski, going from delightfully charming
to downright annoying) can come up with is to make an appearance with their
new celebrity pet at a national fair (I think) and to use the money they
earn to pay off the bank (set aside for the moment the fact that they could
get more than enough cash from donations if they just made their case known
to the public). Problem is, the fair is being held in the middle of the
dreaded "city", a completely foreign place to both the pig and his
companion. 
Setting the main plot in motion, Mrs. Hogget and Babe travel to the unnamed
city and shack up with a sweet lady who just happens to love to help
animals, despite the law that you cannot keep them in hotels. It is here
that we meet an array of eccentric characters, the most memorable being the
family of chimps led by Steven Wright. 
Here is where the film took a wrong turn. Up until this point, I had being
having a rather enjoyable experience. The beginning featured some smart
writing and funny situations involving the farm animals from the first one
and even an inspired moment at the airport where Mrs. Hogget is accused of
smuggling drugs. Unfortunately, the story wears thin as we are introduced
to a new set of animals that reside at the hotel, none of them being even
one-tenth as interesting as the characters from the previous Babe. 
The main topic of discussion surrounding Babe: Pig in the City is the
question of whether or not it is to dark and disturbing for small children,
and I believe it is. At one point, a dog is hung from his neck and slowly
starts to drown. At other times, we are treated to surrealistic flash-backs
to Mrs. Hogget's full cavity search at the airport. In fact, the overall
tone of the movie is rather bleak and depressing. However, that is, as they
say, neither here nor there because kids will probably not like the movie
anyway. The animal characters and their plights were simply not intriguing
enough to sustain my interest for an hour and a half, let alone entertain a
child. 
Another problem I found with the film was it's sudden change of pacing and
tone near the end of the story. If you're going to make a darker and more
sinister sequel, fine. It may not be my cup of tea, but at least it is a
noble ambition. But to go from the downbeat feel of the rest of the movie
and all of a sudden have slapstick finale with Mrs. Hogget swinging from
wall-to-wall of a ballroom in elastic overalls? It just didn't feel right
and was more painful to watch than it was funny or entertaining, and the
same goes for the rest of the movie. 
*Complimentary movie ticket courtesy of Valley Cinemas at 
http://www.movie-tickets.com
**Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
A Simple Plan is a different kind of thriller. While the common
dime-a-dozen suspense film pits the hero against an outside force, all of
the enemies dealt with in this film come from the inside, making the events
that unfold all the more disturbing. Most movies of it's kind deliver cheap
thrills, but this one poses some very frank and tough questions about
paranoia, trust and man's natural capability of evil. After years and years
of formula rehash, A Simple Plan is a very welcome breathe of fresh air. 
Based on Scott Smith's best seller about the deceit and ultimate tragedy
that follows the discovery of millions of dollars by three ill-fated men,
this is as eerie and effective as any thriller I've ever seen. Instead of
rushing the story ahead with unnecessary twists and turns, causing the plot
to be chalk-full of gaps and holes, director Sam Raimi lets the suspense
build slowly, giving us one piece of the puzzle at a time. Even if the film
as a whole had been disappointing, this would still be a prime example of
the art of direction. 
But that's not to say that this isn't just as fine an achievement in other
areas. If the screenplay doesn't grab you right off, you'd better check
yourself for a pulse; Bill Paxton plays Hank Mitchell, a content middle
class feed store manager who, along with his brother Jacob (Billy Bob
Thornton, who could be looking at his second Oscar) and Jacob's friend Lou
(Brent Briscoe), finds roughly four and a half million dollars tucked away
in an abandoned crashed plane. Deducing that it's most likely drug money,
the trio decide to keep the loot for themselves. After all, if someone
comes looking for it, they can always just burn the cash, erasing any
evidence that connected them to the downed aircraft. Figuring this to be a
fool-proof and simple plan, they agree to wait until the plane is uncovered
by the authorities before they split up the money and hit town; all they
have to do is wait. But before they know it, their allegedly "simple" plan
has spiraled into a web of trickery and deceit that will eventually claim
more than one life. 
The acting is also top of the line. As the conspiring brothers, Paxton and
Thornton turn in the performances of both their careers, the former
riveting you with his increasing lust for the money, and Thornton tugging
at your heart strings as the put-upon and neglected Jacob. Both are fine
pieces of work and should not be looked over in favor of showier parts when
Oscar time rolls around. 
However, as accomplished as everything is (including technical aspects like
music and film editing), A Simple Plan belongs to Raimi all the way. Famous
for his rock'em and shock'em gore flicks in the Evil Dead trilogy, he
finally finds his footing to reveal himself as a major talent. I'm just as
big a fan of The Evil Dead as the next guy (perhaps even more so), but this
is the really strong evidence that Raimi is a true master of his
profession. 
*Homepage at http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Inspector Gadget (1999)
Inspector Gadget
Rating (out of five): ZERO STARS
Starring Matthew Broderick, Rupert Everett, Joely Fisher, Michelle
Trachtenberg, Andy Dick, Cheri Oteri,
Michael G. Hagerty, Dabney Coleman and D.L. Hughley
Directed by David Kellogg
Written by Jean Chalopin (based on characters created by Andy Heyward)
Rated PG for comic violence
Theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1
Released in 1999
Running 78 minutes
When I ponder childhood memories past, one of the things that always springs
immediately to mind is watching the "Inspector Gadget" TV show with my older
brother. Truth be told, we were rabid fanatics; our version of Cowboys and
Indians was chasing each other around our coffee table to the theme tune,
alternating who would get to be Gadget and who would be stuck playing the
part of Dr. Claw, the inspector's arch nemesis. I was never a biggie on
nostalgia, but you just can't help but have fond memories of something like
that. Sometimes I even find myself up at 4AM watching re-runs of my favorite
episodes, trying to recapture some of that sense of wonder I felt as a kid.
At the very least, I was expecting the new film version of the classic
television series to have at least some kind of similar effect on me.
Despite how horrid a film may be, the simple task of rekindling even a
slight feeling of nostalgia is pretty tough to screw up. So back I sat, with
minimum expectations of what the movie would deliver (let's face it; exactly
how good can a live-action Disney film really be?).
I was wise enough to steer clear from the likes of Mr. Magoo and George of
the Jungle (two previous Disney adaptations), and I wish to God that I had
been sharp enough to skip Gadget as well. Rarely has a movie left me with
such an utter feeling of emptiness. As everyone else was getting up to exit
the screening room after the movie had completed its assault on mankind, I
was left sitting there, absolutely speechless and totally dumbfounded at
what I had just seen. Can something this awful truly exist in such an
evolved world?
Right from the beginning, I knew I was in trouble. In the opening scenes,
each character is introduced as if their sole purpose is to just be, to
simply serve as real-life duplicates of their cartoon clones. When referring
to them, people almost yell in fear that the audience will not catch on as
to who a certain character is supposed to be ("Oh, hi PENNY! Is BRAIN with
you?"). Creating one-dimensional replicas is one thing; having mere names
take the place of them is quite another.
The "plot", shall we call it, stays fairly in tune with the original series.
Matthew Broderick stars as John Brown (how creative is that?), a security
guard who is horribly injured by a pack of ruthless businessmen headed by
Scolex (why, Rupert Everett, for the love of God why???!!!), who himself is
transformed into Claw by an unfortunate chain of events. Brown is then
rescued and used as a prototype for a new law-enforcement technology wherein
he's joined with various machine parts and some nifty gadgets to form
(drumroll, please)... Inspector Gadget!
>From here on out, the movie becomes a hodgepodge of stupid dialog and
confusing situations (although, to be fair, my confusion could have been
caused by the virtual concussion the film was inflicting upon my fragile
mind). There's something about an evil Gadget taking over the city (his
first crime must have been swiping Matt Dillon's dentures from There's
Something About Mary) and it all ends with (what else?) a bunch of
post-credit nonsense and a cameo by Don Adams himself. To be honest, I
wasn't much paying attention to these "treats". I was just glad that it was
over.
*Find all of Jason's reviews online at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475
**Complimentary movie ticket courtesy of Valley Cinemas at
http://www.movie-tickets.com

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas * * * * (out of four)
Starring Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro, Ellen Barkin, Gary Busey, Cameron
Diaz and Tobey Maguire 
Directed by Terry Gilliam 
Rated R for profanity, non-stop drug use and general weirdness 
Theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1 
Released in 1998 
Running 125 minutes 
Since it's opening on Friday, Terry Gilliam's new film Fear and Loathing in
Las Vegas has, to say the very least, not been received too well by most
film critics. I knew this before I entered the theater yesterday, so I
wasn't expecting to see the masterpiece I had anticipated ever since I saw
the first previews for the movie. However, I still had to see the flick
anyway, no matter how disappointed I might have become (I'm a die-hard
Gilliam fan). For the following two hours, I sat in my seat and scrutinized
every frame of the movie, waiting for just one single scene to slip up or
go wrong. By the time I left the theater, I was completely convinced of one
thing; along with Joel Coen and Quentin Tarantino, Gilliam is one of the
most talented directors working in Hollywood today. 
At first, I was a tad hesitant in writing this particular review because I
fully realize that I'm quite possibly the only critic on the face of this
planet that is going to praise this movie. But I'm just going to come out
and say it, just like I did last year when everyone was attacking U-Turn
and Lost Highway; I loved this movie. 
Much like the other two films I mentioned, Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas
isn't so much about story or plot as it is about style and construction.
Hell, I defy anyone to give me an even semi-rational explanation of the
plot of Lynch's Lost Highway. But like I said, plot doesn't matter; that
was an exploration of the possibilities of cinema. Much like an abstract
painting, if you will, only put on film instead of a canvas. 
How can this film be about plot when it's only existing trace of a
storyline involves a drug-addled journalist (Johnny Depp, with his head
shaved and sporting a cigarette holder) and his allegedly Samoan attorney
(Benicio Del Toro, gaining about sixty pounds since his Usual Suspects
days) getting stoned out of their minds and trashing hotel rooms virtually
beyond recognition? That is the plot in it's entirety. Along the way,
though, they do encounter a variety of characters (played mostly by
celebrities in quick cameos), including Gary Busey as a "lonely" (hehe)
highway patrol officer and Cameron Diaz as a woman who has Del Toro
convinced that she is in love with him merely because they made eye
contact. 
I've been told that the novel from which this was based (written by Hunter
S. Thompson - one of the supposedly cool beatnik authors that I have yet to
be acquainted with) is so weird and bizarre that it would be almost
un-filmable using any conventional film concepts and techniques. I've also
been told by some that have seen this movie that it is pretty much a direct
translation of the novel, complete with alot of cool narration. So
shouldn't we be giving Gilliam at least some credit for filming a story
that was thought to be so odd that it could not be put on celluloid? Even
if you don't dig the movie, you at least have to admire that. 
One one of the many strong points of Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas that I
forgot to mention earlier is the awesome as hell soundtrack that the film
features. If you want to hear what is probably the best movie soundtrack
since Reservoir Dogs, featuring such mind-altering tunes as "White Rabbit",
"One Toke Over the Line" and "Get Together", I strongly urge you to buy a
copy of the CD (I'm listening to it as I type, as a matter of fact). 
I know it's going to sound odd for me to say this about what is basically
just a drug trip in movie form, but I seriously doubt that you will see
very many films come out this year that are as good as this one. It's that
well made. 

Title
Review for GoodFellas (1990)
     Many people find the mafia life attractive.  I mean, let's face it; on
the surface, they pretty much have it made.  Money, power, women; what more
could a guy ask for?   But there is also a down side to it.  Always having
to watch your back, getting in trouble with the cops, etc.  Martin
Scorsese's "GoodFellas" shows us exactly what it is like to be a part of
the mafia.  Being the brilliant man that he is, Marty shows us both sides
of this life with  painful realism.  
     Ray Liotta plays Henry Hill, a half-Irish, half-Sicilian member of the
mafia.  As the film begins, we see Robert DeNiro, Joe Pesci and Ray driving
in a car, noticing a banging that seems to be coming from the trunk.  They
get out to investigate, Pesci having his butcher knife ready.  They open
the trunk to find that their victim is not quite dead.  Pesci, being the
psychotic nut he is, viciously attacks the bound and helpless victim. 
This, I think, is the perfect opening for this film.  It shows us just how
graphic and cruel "the life" can really be.
     Then we are shown Henry as a young man, always watching the local
mobsters from his bedroom window, constantly envying them.  Soon, he is
"adopted" by the local family.  They have him do odd jobs (i.e. setting
fire to cars, making deliveries).  The family is run by Pauly (Paul
Sorvino), the godfather figure who goes not want his outfit to get into the
narcotics business (much like Marlon Brando's character in the original
"Godfather").  
     Later, Henry is again an adult and is still in "the business". He
falls in love (more or less) and marries a Jewish girl (Lorraine Braco,
Oscar nominated performance).  One of his buddies is fellow mobster Tommy
DeVito (Joe Pesci, in the performance of his career), the hot-head who
knifed the guy in the trunk at the beginning of the film.  He's really the
one who starts all the trouble, but I won't get into that right now.
     Tho "GoodFellas" is not quite as totally cool or classic as Francis
Ford Coppola's "The Godfather", it is a tad more realistic and lurid.  In
Coppola's romantic version of mob life, you were dealing with high-class
mafiosos, not street thugs like you are here.  These are the people that
truly don't give a crap about anybody or anything except themselves.  These
are the people who don't know the meaning of the word "loyalty".  These are
the people that you could see walking down the street and not even know
that they're hard-core criminals.  
     Martin Scorsese has delivered yet another masterpiece here. I mean,
this one is right up there with "Raging Bull", "Taxi Driver" and "Mean
Streets".  My big question is why hasn't the Academy ever given Marty an
Oscar?  By now, he deserves at least three or four.  Do they have something
against brilliant minds or are they just plain stupid?
     Anyway, I highly, highly recommend this film if you are looking for a
well-made, hip, stylish and just plain cool gangster flick.

Title
Review for Liar Liar (1997)
"Liar Liar" * 
Starring Jim Carrey, Maura Tierney, Jennifer Tilly, Swoosie Kurtz, Amanda
Donohoe, Jason Bernard, Mitchell Ryan, Anne Haney, Justin Cooper, Cary
Elwes, Randall "Tex" Cobb and Cheri Oteri 
Directed by Tom Shadyac 
What is it about Jim Carrey that America finds so appealing? Let's face it,
folks: if you're over the age of ten, the guy just isn't funny. I mean,
fart jokes can only take you so far. So what is it? He obviously isn't a
sex symbol (unless, of course, you dig dorky guys with bad haircuts). Why
does this man win so many awards? Why is he so popular? I do not have the
answers, and until someone does, this question will plague mankind for
years to come. Why doesn't someone just come out and tell him that he's
just a jerk who makes a living by making a complete asshole of himself? 
And the real kicker is this: it seems that Jimmy actually thinks he has
talent! I heard that when he was with his firs wife, he wouldn't do
anything that involved work because he said it "disrupted his creative
juices". Can you believe this guy? Here you have great actors like Steve
Buscemi or Joe Mantegna struggling on the fringes, while no-talent-bums
like Carrey are making twenty million dollars a movie and they get
conceited!!! Okay, I'm done now. 
Actually, I miss stated what I said above. What I meant was that Jim Carrey
has no talent as a comedian. In "Liar Liar", he is alot better in the
serious scenes that in the comedic ones. The guy just can't make me laugh
(although he came close in "Dumb and Dumber", but it was mostly the other
characters that made that a good film). Maybe (and I'm stressing the
"maybe" part) if he got a good script that didn't have him jumping around
like an idiot for an hour and a half, he might (again, might) make
something of himself. He just can't keep going on like this if he wants to
be taken at least somewhat seriously. 
Okay, now for the movie. The film, like Carrey himself, just isn't funny.
But, I will give it one star for at least trying. I admit that maybe once
or twice I had a mild smirk on my face. And how's this for a plot: for his
birthday wish, a kid wishes that his father can't lie for twenty four
hours. A little super-natural, if ya ask me. Then you have Carrey put in
obvious situations where if he tells the truth, he could be in some serious
trouble. In other words, same Jim Carrey crap, different title. 
Of course, the makers of "Liar Liar" have to be predictable and make part
of the storyline have to do with him winning back the wife he divorced (who
he cheated on, nonetheless). Doesn't it mean anything to her that he was
unfaithful? Is this really a good lesson to be teaching today's teens? As
amoral as kids are today, do we really need the message that if you commit
adultery, everything will probably end up okay if you don't do it anymore?
If you answered no, then you're right. Not to get all preachy or anything
(by the way, if you don't want to know how the film ends, skip the rest of
this paragraph), but don't you think it would be a little more realistic if
the wife didn't end up back with Jim Carrey? Wait, what am I talking about?
Of course any shred of realism is absent in a Carrey flick... 
But I guess credit is due for Maura Tierney (or whatever the name is of
that girl from "NewsRadio") who plays the divorced wife planning to marry
again (this time to Cary Elwes - a much better choice, in my humble
opinion). Her character always seems real, even in scenes with Carrey.
Kudos to her for being the only positive thing about this film (well, her
and maybe Jennifer Tilly). 
Out of all the crapsterpieces to come out of 1997 (including, mind you, the
likes of "Speed 2: Cruise Control", "The Lost World: Jurassic Park" and
"Batman and Robin"), this is probably one of the very worst. Or I guess you
could be optimistic and see it as bad filmmaking at it's best. You be the
judge (if you want to waste an hour and a half of your life, that is). 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Angel Heart (1987)
Angel Heart (1987)
Rating (out of five): ****1/2
Starring Mickey Rourke, Robert DeNiro, Lisa Bonet, Charlotte Rampling,
Michael Higgins, Stocker Fontelieu,
Brownie McGhee and Dann Florek
Directed by Alan Parker
Written by Parker (based on a novel by William Hjortsberg)
Rated R for graphic violence, profanity and sex
Theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1
Released in 1987
Running 112 minutes
Not many movies capture a mood the way Angel Heart does. Right from its
opening moments, the film begins to show off its incredible use of lighting
and visual structure, giving us a shot of a common New York alleyway. It's
quite an effective scene; watching it, you can't help but feel slightly
claustrophobic as the camera pans over the narrow alley, only to reveal that
it harbors a deadly secret. Technically, the scene is flawless.
But not only is that opening shot a marvel of cinematography and lighting,
but it also sets up the mood for what is to follow. Throughout the movie, we
think we're right there in the middle of things, maybe even a step or two
ahead of its hero. Then every so often, the story surprises us and reveals
that it has something up its sleeve, and at times that something can be far
more complicated than we at first perceive it to be.
That said hero is a private investigator named Harry Angel (Mickey Rourke),
a classic dick in the vein of the greats like Philip Marlowe and Jake
Gittes. He smokes, he womanizes, and above all, he doesn't seem to give a
damn about anybody. As the narrative opens circa 1950s, he is called upon by
a mysterious foreigner by the name of Louis Cyphre (Robert DeNiro, in an
extended cameo) to track down a missing band singer called Johnny Favorite.
It appears that Favorite once enlisted the aid of Cyphre, but has since
disappeared and left his debt unpaid. Angel's job then sounds simple enough;
merely find out if Favorite is alive or dead, and report his findings to the
elusive Cyphre. But through the course of the film, it becomes clear that
not everything is exactly what it seems, as Angel is pulled into the dark
world of New Orleans and all that inhabits.
Angel Heart follows in the tradition of some of my favorite movies from the
past, films like Chinatown and Sleuth, puzzle-box movies that at first seem
to be about one thing but then reveal themselves to be about something else
altogether. And indeed, Angel Heart borrows heavily from its predecessors,
not just visually but also thematically. Strangely, though, it never comes
across as a rip-off in any way, nor does it seem to be a gimmicky homage.
Bruce Willis' latest summer vehicle The Sixth Sense has recently took
America by storm, shocking unsuspecting audiences with its "jolting"
conclusion. Much like that film, some of the central themes in Angel Heart
are only made clear after the credits have begun rolling. And, yes, this
movie also features a finale that is designed to surprise the audience. The
only difference is, this time the trick worked. While The Sixth Sense and
its ending are more likely to leave you scratching your head, the ending of
Angel Heart makes perfect sense even under intense scrutiny. And also like
the Bruce Willis film, I knew the twist here before seeing the movie. Now,
I've gotten some pretty nasty e-mails attacking my review of The Sixth
Sense, most of them informing me that the sole reason I disliked the film so
much was because I had prior knowledge of the last twist. I guess, if
nothing else, Angel Heart at least proves that a movie can be extremely
effective and enjoyable even if the viewer is robbed of the surprise ending.
As good as the final trick is, the real star of the show here is Mickey
Rourke. In the '80s, he kind of existed as that decade's equivalent of
Marlon Brando. Constantly on the cutting edge, he went for the more risque
roles that other actors wouldn't dream of touching in fear of being forever
thought of as soft-core porn stars. But, sadly, the allusion to Brando
turned out to be all too accurate; much like the Godfather of film, he has
now drifted into obscurity. Every once in a while, he does land a film job,
but ends up being fired because he can't remember his lines (to be fair, in
the last movie he was working on, he was kicked off the set after demanding
that his small dog be featured in one of the shoot-out scenes).
But Angel Heart features Rourke in the prime of his acting days, and indeed
is one of his more steamy efforts. In fact, upon release, the movie was
slapped with the "X" rating due to one of its more controversial moments, a
truly unsettling and disturbing sex scene between Rourke and Lisa Bonet
(formally of "The Cosby Show"). Explaining exactly how the sequence is so
upsetting would be hard without giving away key plot points, but if you are
easily shaken you might want to fast-forward through it, even if it is one
of the most potent points. Eventually, 10 seconds were cut from the
interlude, but they are restored for most home video versions.
If you've the stomach to take it, Angel Heart serves as a very nice (albeit
unpleasant) alternative to trekking off to the local cineplex and wasting
your money on seeing The Sixth Sense for the third time.
*Find all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Rich Man's Wife, The (1996)
The Rich Man's Wife is one of those movies like Final Analysis or Body
Double, where the story and characters are so one-dimensional and contrived
that you know you shouldn't be enjoying yourself. But somehow, the movie
just tries so hard that you begin to forgive it and get into the swing of
things. Not that it's bad, it's just that it's been done before; and
better, in my opinion. 
I realize that this is going to sound pretty bizarre, but it's probably the
best analogy that I can come up with right now; you know how when you see a
spider or something in your toilet, striving helplessly to get out, and
instead of just flushing him, you end up kind of rooting for the little
guy? That's basically how I felt about this movie. I mean, it's not very
good, but it's not completely bad either. 
The wife of the title is Josie Potenza (played nicely by Halle Berry). She
is married to Tony (Christopher McDonald...you know, the guy who looks like
Joe Piscapo), a really stressed-out businessman who drinks way to much and
doesn't give Josie the attention she deserves (*cough, cough*). Thus, she
is driven into the arms of another man, Jake Golden (Clive Owen). Near the
beginning of the film, Josie decides to try and work things out with Tony
by dumping Jake and going on a vacation to a remote cabin in the woods. 
Once there, however, Tony has to leave almost immediately due to business
details (I'm still not quite sure what line of work he's in). Making the
best of her situation, Josie stays there and begins making the rounds at
the local bars. One night, she meets a stranger named Cole (Peter Greene,
finally getting a meaty role). They have dinner together, and eventually,
both Josie and the audience start to realize that Cole is homicidal. After
learning that she is not happily married, Cole offers to "take care" of the
problem. 
Managing to escape from the psychotic maniac, Josie returns home and starts
a reconciliation with her estranged and very wealthy husband. But then one
night, Cole shows up... 
And here is where the fun begins. From this point on, it's going to be a
no-holds- barred cliche-fest, ripping off every movie from Strangers on a
Train to The Usual Suspects. This is why most critics panned this movie
when it first came out. And for the most part, they're right; The Rich
Man's Wife has nary one original bone in it's body. But who cares? If
you're looking for good ol' dumb suspense movie, you can't do much better
than this. And if you suspense buffs aren't already sold, it has a killer
of an ending too. 

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
Magnolia
Rating (out of five): *****
Starring John C. Reilly, Tom Cruise, Jason Robards, Julianne Moore, Philip
Baker Hall, Philip Seymore Hoffman, Melora Walters, William H. Macy,
Jeremy Blackman, Alfred Molina, Luis Guzman and Ricky Jay
Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson
Written by Anderson
Rated R for profanity, drug use, brief nudity and suggested sex
Theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1
Released in 1999
Running 188 minutes
It's difficult to put into words the kind of impact that a film like
Magnolia leaves you with. It's a film so beautiful, so profound, so
unexplainably exhilarating that you can't help but feel charged after seeing
it. But.....
Let's get one thing straight right off the bat: this is not a film for
everybody. Something happens at the end of Magnolia that will be talked
about and pondered over for years to come, dividing critics and public alike
into those who see no relevance in the event, and those who see it as the
most original and innovative sequence in recent movie history. Taken at face
value, it's a plot twist so arbitrary and outlandish that it's likely to
send a good deal of theater patrons out the door, laughing and clutching
their sides (at the screening I attended, a good percentage of the audience
walked out in such a way).
Although, once examined and taken into context with the rest of the film, I
can think of no better way to end the movie. And it is your tolerance of
this ending that will finalize your feelings about the film. However,
despite what your personal opinion of the movie may be, there is no denying
its originality.
Sure, the basic premise is familiar; chronicling 24 hours in the lives of an
assortment of San Fernando Valley citizens, Magnolia probably sounds more
than a bit like Robert Altman's 1993 film Short Cuts, another
three-hour-plus drama interlinking various, seemingly-unrelated characters
and events. But it's director Paul Thomas Anderson's style that sets this
film apart from it apparent predecessor. While Altman's film was bitter and
pessimistic, Anderson shows a great deal of affection for each of his
creations.
>From foul-mouthed sex guru Frank T.J. Mackey (an Oscar-worthy Tom Cruise)
and his dying father (Jason Robards) to a kind-hearted cop played by John C.
Reilly (who also starred in Anderson's other two features, Hard Eight and
Boogie Nights), every character in Magnolia is treated with the utmost
respect. Nobody in the film's huge cast ever falters, and Anderson leads
them with such a sure hand that it's no surprise that they make up the best
ensemble performance I've seen in years.
But this is so much more than just a film showcasing great performances.
Tackling universal themes such as forgiveness and redemption like no movie I
've ever seen (and probably ever will see), Magnolia is a very important
achievement in the art of filmmaking.
At one point late in the picture, a key character observes that "you may be
done with the past, but the past ain't done with you". While most movies
would simply address this theme by use of conventional standards, Magnolia
reaches for something more, and conveys its theme with all the intensity and
rage of a thunderstorm. Therein lies its brilliance.
*Find all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Meet the Feebles (1989)
Starring Robert the Hedgehog, Heide the Hippo, Bletch the Walrus, Trevor
the Rat, Sebastian the Fox, Harry the Hare, Lucille the Poodle, Wynard the
Frog, Samantha the Siamese Cat and Sid the Elephant 
Rated X for sex, nudity, profanity, violence, gore and general tasteless
humor 
I've never seen a film quite like "Meet the Feebles", and I doubt that I
ever will again. It is a film so crude, so tasteless and so lurid that one
can only wonder how it was even released in the first place. However, it is
also what is probably one of the most hilarious films I've ever seen,
taking a backseat only to some of the Monty Python flicks. Yep, it's...an X
rated puppet flick!!! And if you can just get past that concept without
being completely turned-off and horrified, you're in for a real treat. 
The Feebles are, essentially, the Muppets gone off the deep end. Instead of
being cute and funny gripping about paychecks, the Feebles are too busy
doing horrible, unspeakable things to each other to worry about their
wages. But as bad as these characters are, director Peter Jackson puts a
lovable spin on each and every one of his creations, making even such
otherwise despicable characters as Trevor the rat (who films S&M porn
movies in the basement) into genuinely likeable people. 
The story revolves around one day and night during rehearsals for a live
telecast of the "Feeble Variety Hour" (yet another spin on the Muppets) and
the many problems that come up during this time. The star of the show is
Heide, a very large hippo with some even bigger emotional problems,
constantly stuffing herself with any kind of cake available and weeping
over scrapbooks with pictures of her and Bletch, the walrus producer of the
show. Walrus, unbeknownst to Heide, is having an affair with his secretary,
a slutty Siamese cat named Samantha. On top of this, Robert (a hedgehog who
pronounces his name "Wobert") has just landed a new job in the chorus, and
Trevor (the aforementioned rat) is trying to recruit the poor hedgehog's
poodle girlfriend Lucille as new talent for his smut pictures. 
If this isn't enough, Wynard (the knife-throwing frog) is in the last
stages of drug addiction and has problems not making Swiss cheese out of
his assistants because of his extreme depression and shellshock regarding
the Vietnam war (illustrated in a brilliant parody of "The Deer Hunter"),
not to mention his drug withdrawal. And how could we forget the unfortunate
hare named Harry, who has recently (due to his habit of all-night orgies)
contracted a nasty little VD and has been diagnosed to have just twelve
hours to live (kind of like a soap opera, eh?)? In the end, this all
amounts to a brilliantly apocalyptic finale that is kind of like "Carrie"
meets "Rambo". 
And there's more...but I won't get into it, as one of the movie's chief
pleasures is having the delightfully witty narrative unfold before you.
What Jackson has done here is taken what would otherwise be a juvenile,
disgusting and ultimately pathetic story and elevated it to become some
sort of twisted masterpiece. I wasn't sure what to make of it when it was
finally over, and I'm sure that other people might hate it, but that does
not alter the fact that anyone who meets the Feebles will have a hard time
forgetting them.
Visit Jason Wallis' "Filmaholics Anonymous" web site at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475 

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
Starring Robin Williams, Cuba Gooding, Jr., Annabella Sciorra, Max von
Sydow, Jessica Brooks, Josh Paddock and Rosalind Chao 
Rated PG-13 for very mature themes and mild profanity 
"What Dreams May Come" is like two movies in one. On one hand, it's one of
the most manipulative, dry, boring and even silly dramas I've ever seen.
The title may come from a quote from "Hamlet", but believe me; "Hamlet" it
ain't. Also, Vincent Ward's direction is so self-indulgent it's almost
laughable. But on another, much more positive note, it is the most
breathtakingly beautiful film this critic has ever seen. No other movie in
the history of cinema has taken me on such a sensory journey for the senses
and, above all, the imagination. There are shots in this film that will
literally make your mouth drop open. In my mind, there is absolutely no
question as to what should/will pick up some Oscars in March for
cinematography and art direction. 
However, as visually stunning as "Dreams" is, the monotonous and rather
shallow narrative really bogs it down. Despite predictably great
performances from the film's two leads, Robin Williams (who may be looking
at another nomination, if he doesn't nab one for the up-coming "Patch
Adams") and Annabella Sciorra, it never really rises out of the hole it dug
itself into to become the truly great film experience that it should have
been. Something with this much potential can't afford any screw-ups. 
The story starts out promising, but as I said, gets increasingly
predictable and silly. Williams is Chris Nielsen, a married doctor mourning
the recent deaths of his two children (Jessica Brooks and Josh Paddock),
who died in a car wreck. In a coincidence even the film seems to find
extreme, Chris dies a short time later in yet another car crash trying to
save someone else's life. 
Chris is taken to Heaven (though not immediately), where he meets an old
doctor friend of his now acting as his guide and companion in his own
version of the afterlife. For a short time, Chris runs free, enjoying the
unparalleled pleasures of the kingdom of God. 
Here is where the strong art direction and cinematography kick in.
Williams' vision of Heaven is so unique and, for lack of a better word,
revolutionary, that I just sat in my seat and gawked at what I was seeing. 
After a while, it is found out that Chris' wife Annie, distraught over her
recent losses, took her own life and is now condemned to an eternity in
Hell. Only with the help of another guide called, plainly enough, The
Tracker (Max von Sydow - is anyone surprised?) will Chris be able to travel
to the underworld and bring back the woman he loves. 
It is also worth noting that the film's vision of Hell are equally as
stunning as Heaven's. It is still beautiful and brilliantly realized, only
in a much darker and more disturbing way. 
All in all, director Ward took what had the potential to be the very best
of '98s films, put in some stupid plot twists (the "twists" that I'm
referring to occur not once, not twice, but three times during the movie.
The only problem is, it's the same twist over and over!) and slapped on a
happy, smilely and way to sappy ending, all to assure box office results.
Note to Hollywood; when you have great material, put it in the hands of a
capable filmmaker. 
*Complimentary movie ticket courtesy of Valley Cinemas at
http://www.movie-tickets.com
**Find all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for BASEketball (1998)
BASEketball * * * (out of four)
Starring Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Yasmine Bleeth, Jenny McCarthy, Robert
Vaughn, Ernest Borgnine, Dian Bacher, Robert Stack and Kareen Abdul-Jabbar 
Directed by David Zucker 
Rated R for profanity and crude, sex related humor 
Theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1 
Released in 1998 
Running 98 minutes 
Exactly how far is too far? Lately, we've been seeing alot of movies that
pose this question. Most recently, there was There's Something About Mary,
the newest attack on the senses by the Farrely Brothers (Dumb and Dumber,
Kingpin). I'm not expecting anyone else to agree with me, but I'm convinced
I will not see a better film all year than Mary. Unlike their first outing,
Dumb and Dumber (which supplied dick and fart jokes without even a hint of
an actual story), their latest venture gives us plenty of dick and fart
humor, only this time also give us the truest, sweetest romantic comedy
since When Harry Met Sally... It was, quite simply, a masterpiece of comic
timing and truths about the nature of love and it's effects. Now, in the
wake of Mary's success, the same idiots who brought us The Naked Gun and
it's sequels bring us BASEketball... not very good timing on the Zuckers'
part if you ask me. 
Unfortunately, this film falls into the same trap that the Farrely's first
film did. It takes what could have been a wildly satiric and delightfully
gross send-up of modern sports and turned it into...that's right; an attack
on the senses without a good story or characters. But despite it's flaws,
the movie is funny and I'd be lying if I said I didn't laugh. Hell, some
parts had me in tears. I defy anyone to describe some of BASEketball's key
sight gags and still keep a straight face. However, it's also one of the
most uneven comedies I've seen in years. 
The plot is pretty much self explanatory. Trey Parker and Matt Stone
(creators of "South Park" - the best television show of last year) play Joe
Cooper and Doug Remer, two hopelessly inept best buddies who inadvertently
invent baseketball, an obviously idiotic fusing of baseball and basketball.
The main catch is that while an opponent is preparing to take a shot, you
can do anything in your power (short of physically attacking him) to stop
him from making it. 
Let me take a time out here and explain why these so-called psyche-outs are
pivotal to the marginal success of BASEketball. These are the times that
had me in tears, trying desperately to catch my breath. During the normal
comedy routines in this film, most of the jokes are either not funny or
just plain too cruel and sick to laugh at. Even I, the sick-humor hound,
felt uncomfortable during the section of jokes focusing on dying children.
Sometimes I like to tell myself that there isn't a line, that anything
that'll get a chuckle is fair game. But watching these scenes, I came to
realize that there are just some things not to be made fun of. Thankfully,
the movie only takes about ten minutes in executing these jokes. Trust me -
go get popcorn when the time rolls around. 
Where was I? Oh yeah; the psyche-outs. These are actually what make the
film somewhat recommendable. You wouldn't believe the kinds of things these
guys do to make a distraction. Pornographic t-shirts, discussions of
necrophilia, gay bashing, mutilation, eating fat from Marlon Brando's ass;
you name it. They are, essentially, the highlights of the movie. 
Like I said, the plot is pretty standard. When the owner of the Beers
(Ernest Borgnine - yeah!!!) chokes on a hotdog and dies, he leaves the team
to Cooper...if and only if he leads the team to victory in the next season.
A-ha. This is the perfect opportunity for the late owner's Anna Nicole
Smith-esque wife (Jenny McCarthy) to swipe the team from the rightful
owners. Al she has to do is keep them from winning. 
Again, as far as plot and characters go, BASEketball leaves much to be
desired. But the numerous psyche-outs, most of them done with a stroke of
brilliance, are alone enough for me to marginally recommend this irreverent
comedy. 
E-mail: rwallis@inreach.com
Homepage: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
"Independence Day" * * 1/2 (out of four)
Starring Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Mary McDonnell, Judd
Hirsch, Brent Spiner and Randy Quaid
Directed by Roland Emmerich
     Anyone who knows me is aware of my hatred for comtemporary Hollywood.
I loathe almost every big budget Hollywood production I come across.  Oh,
sure, there's the rare exception (i.e. "Face/Off" and "Men in Black"), but
they're mostly just cash-cow crap.  And the only reason these exceptions
are actually good is because of character development or just sheer
cleverness.  Well, Roland Emmerich's "Independence Day" posseses neither of
these qualities.  But I was shocked to discover that, although in a very
guilty-pleasurish way, I actually kinnda dug it.
     Usually, I am not entertained by mere explosions and loud noises, but
the makers of "Independence Day" (or "ID4") accompany all the stupid
explosions and whatnot with some very good one-liners, delivered very
effectivly by the entire cast. I particularly liked (as I'm sure everyone
did) the character played by Will Smith.  I was never a big fan of his TV
show "The Fresh Prince of Bel Air" and have never seen nor have any desire
to see "Bad Boys" (mostly because of Martin Lawrence - can't stand the
guy), but here, he shows that he was some real talent that other action
stars like Sylvester Stalone or Ah-nold Schwarzenegger very rarely get to
display.  And when he made the fantastic "Men in Black" the following year,
he proved to the world (or me, at least) that he truly deserves his star
status.  Judd Hirsch and Randy Quaid are also great in their roles, by the
way.
     But, having said that, there are not enough strong points in
"Independence Day" for me to really recommend it.  Many great actors are
wasted in this film, especially Brent Spiner.  Now I've never been a huge
Trekie, but anyone who's seen even a single episode of "Star Trek: The Next
Generation" can see that Spiner is an excellent actor (he even had a cool
cameo in "Phenomenon").  But no, instead of taking a well-written role to
make make a cameo appearence, he has to choose to play the sterotypical
nutcase scientist.  In "Star Trek", even though he played an android, you
could see underlying emotions that not very many other actors could
pull-off.  Here, he just seems like a grown-up asshole trying to be funny. 
     And then there's Bill Pullman, who I'm a huge fan of.  He shines in
almost every film he's in and I think he even deserves an Oscar nomination
for his recent role in "Lost Highway".  Well, here, he sucks.  And it's not
that his acting sucks, it's that his character is very poorly written and
extrememly one-dimentional.  However, you can't really blame poor Bill
because, despite how good of an actor you are, if you're given a bad
character, you can't be expected to perform.  Just look at Jack Nicholson
in "Mars Attacks!".  Even though he's the greatest actor to ever live, he
couldn't get anything out of his character (or characters, in his case).
     And as for Roland Emmerich, he just needs to find a good story to
film.  With his earlier "Stargate", even though the actual final product
was horrible, he showed amazing skill as a director.  
     Oh, and I almost forgot to mention all the people who were calling
this piece of psuedocrap "Star Wars" for the 90s.  Do yourself a favor and
watch it again, only this
time on video.  Just 'cause a movie is loud and shakes your seat in the
theater, that doesn't mean it can be compared to a classic like "Star Wars"
or any of it's sequels.  That just isn't right.
     So, I actually almost-sorta-kinnda recommend "Independence Day" just
for the performances from Will Smith, Judd Hirsch and Randy Quaid and maybe
even for some of the one-liners.  But I still don't see how the American
public can make this one of the top grossing films of all time.  Maybe it's
not up to me to understand...

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
Starring Adam Sandler, Fairuza Balk, Kathy Bates, Henry Winkler, Jerry
Reed, Blake Clark and Larry Gilliard, Jr. 
It's amazing how a comedian can have the some of the funniest stand-up
around but completely fall flat in the movies. Take Adam Sandler. On the
basis of his first two CDs ("They're All Gonna Laugh at You!" and "What the
Hell Happened to Me?"), he's the best thing to hit comedy since Robin
Williams. But when you put him in front of a camera, it just isn't the
same. I kind of enjoyed Happy Gilmore and thought that it warranted a
marginal recommendation, but his latest film, The Waterboy is about as
funny as a root canal. 
Seriously, I'm willing to wager than there were more laughs in Saving
Private Ryan than there are here. In fact, I found this movie to be more
depressing than comedic. The first half hour generated not one smile in me,
with it's scenes of emotional abuse towards Adam's character of Bobby
Boucher not only by the cruel football players, but also by his very
disturbed mother (Kathy Bates - what is the world coming to?). Granted,
after the film gets rolling, there are a few mild chuckles throughout (I'm
even willing to admit that it actually had me laughing once or twice), but
not nearly enough to sustain The Waterboy for it's nearly hour and a half
running time. 
You're all familiar with the plot because you've seen it at least a million
times before; everyone picks on the hero until he shows a hidden talent and
leads the underdog team to victory over the champions, in the process not
only winning the respect of his teammates but also getting the woman he
loves. And believe me, I'm not giving anything away by saying that
Sandler's team wins. If you would actually feel any degree of suspense
watching this movie, then God be with you. 
The only things that keep this bomb from getting the big banana are the
winning performances from Henry Winkler as the insecure coach and the
severely underrated Fairuza Balk as Bobby's love interest. I mean, they
should be lending their talents to some loftier purpose, but they do
extremely well with what they are given here. Kudos to both of them. 
My advice to Adam is to try and follow in the footsteps of veteran
comedians like Williams and Steve Martin, who made a very smooth and
successful transition from stage to screen. Rely more on actual comedy
rather than strange voices and rude noises to make people laugh. Or maybe
even show what dramatic talent he might have, like Jim Carrey did with the
recent Truman Show. With the obvious and considerable talent that he
possesses, he just can't keep going on like this. 
See all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Angela's Ashes (1999)
Angela's Ashes
Rating (out of five): **1/2
Starring Emily Watson, Robert Carlyle, Joseph Breen, Ciaran Owens, Michael
Legge, Shane Murray-Corcoran, Ronnie Masterson and Pauline McLynn
Directed by Alan Parker
Written by Laura Jones (based on the memoirs of Frank McCourt)
Rated R for profanity, nudity and vileness
Theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1
Released in 1999
Running 145 minutes
I've never been one to subscribe to any kind of standardized rules for
filmmaking, but one thing I do believe is that every movie should have a
point. Otherwise, it's just a waste of time.
While some movies may exist simply as eye-candy and may not persue any
lofty, artistic objectives, at least they have their sights set on
something - entertainment. What's so frustrating about Alan Parker's latest
film, Angela's Ashes, is that it's void of any narrative aspirations
whatsoever. While it may be full of outstanding performances and skillful
direction, all it really amounts to is two hours and twenty minutes of rain,
sickness, death, rain, and humiliation. Did I mention the rain?
Perhaps all this is supposed to serve as a metaphor for the poverty-stricken
childhood of Frank McCourt, who came of age in the turbulent landscape of
pre-WWII Limerick. One of six children (three of which die before the film's
twenty minute mark) growing up in the Irish slums during the late 1930's,
McCourt did eventually escape from poverty to America, where he wrote the
best-selling memoir upon which the movie is based.
The critical clich has been to dismiss the film version of Angela's Ashes
for being dry of the apparent wit and livelihood that peppered McCourt's
original memoirs. Having not read his book, I can't jump on that bandwagon,
and thus wish to point out another glaring folly; while the movie is
definitely without any humor or relief, it's also mind-numbing in its
tedium. Really, how many times can one watch an infant die from
malnutrition, only to have their father go out and drink away the family
income? It's depressing, disconcerting, and, above all, totally without
point. I don't need to see the same thing in succession in order to realize
what a horrible childhood McCourt suffered.
Not that I have anything against films dealing with depressing themes; some
of my favorite movies include such classic downers as Last Tango in Paris
and Leaving Las Vegas, as well as the more recent, though equally bleak,
Magnolia. What separates these films from the likes of Angela's Ashes is
their tendency towards emotional catharsis. On the contrary, this film
features the most anticlimactic ending in recent memory.
What disappoints me most about Angela's Ashes is the amount of talent that
went into it, only to come up with something so mediocre. There's no arguing
the skills of actress Emily Watson (who plays the title role of Angela), and
Robert Carlyle (as the imposing drunken father) is emerging as one of the
best character actors around. Indeed, they are both nearly flawless in their
respective roles. With a director as talented as Alan Parker (Angel Heart,
The Commitments) helming the production, you'd think that nothing could
possibly go wrong.
In my eyes, many things did go wrong. But maybe, just maybe, Angela's Ashes
has turned out exactly as the filmmakers intended. In fact, perhaps the
movie did have a point after all - to harbor awards. Before opening day, it
had some of the heaviest Oscar buzz around, no doubt generated by the
subject matter alone. Now that it has opened, however, it has revealed
itself to be a drab, murky bore.
*Find all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
Under any other circumstances, I would not be discussing the ending of a
film to the extent that I will in this particular review. However, in order
to fully explain exactly how and why this movie is so awful, a minute
dissection of the ending is necessary. Even though I will not reveal the
details of the last scenes, do proceed at your own risk.
The movie opens (quite poorly, I might add) as child psychologist Malcolm
Crowe (Bruce Willis, looking like he was dragged out of his trailer at the
wee hours of the morning to shoot each scene) and his wife are intruded upon
by one of Malcolm's past patients. Distraught, the suicidal man (a cameo by
New Kid on the Block Donnie Wahlberg) shoots Malcolm and then turns the gun
on himself.
Cut to the "next fall", as we find the good doctor quietly observing his
latest case, a trouble young man named Cole (Haley Joel Osment, one of the
only child actors in a while I didn't want to bludgeoned over the head with
a blunt instrument). After about 45 minutes of seemingly unrelated freak
occurrences, we learn that Cole has "the sixth sense", the gift of being
able to communicate with the dead. And this, as they say, is where the
healing begins.
The Sixth Sense and its unexpected popularity is founded upon a twist ending
that I knew going into the film (one of Roger Ebert's colleges was kind
enough to give it away on a recent segment of "Siskel and Ebert"). Although
I was at first enraged that an established film critic could so callously
ruin a film for thousands of patrons, I soon realized that this turn of
events could in fact have been a blessing in disguise; I've always been a
sucker for surprise endings (my favorite movie is The Usual Suspects) and
rarely dislike a film that sports one. Here, since I knew the major plot
twist that was coming at the film's conclusion, the possibly of being
bamboozled into loving a bad movie solely because of its ending (something
I've fallen victim to in the past) was eliminated.
And indeed, my viewing of The Sixth Sense did prove to be quite an
enlightening experiment. Stripped of the element of surprise, the film was
put to the task of showing what it really had, instead of simply hiding
behind a shocking conclusion. After seeing its true colors, I came to the
conclusion that The Sixth Sense is, despite what the many champions of the
movie may say, void of any real power. It's a neat concept, but not one that
justifies being made into a feature-length movie.
In fact, The Sixth Sense relies so strongly on its finale that the rest of
the film develops as a sort of prelude to the supposedly earth-shattering
revelation that is yet to come. And when the final moments do come, it's a
huge letdown; the end makes no sense at all. It stupefied me with the
heights of its ineptitude and is completely idiotic on a fundamental and
very rare level. I won't go into any details, but suffice to say that, as
far as I can tell, it negates to rest of the movie to such an extent that
anyone who buys it even for a second must be suffering from a very acute
case of Attention Deficit Disorder.
Now, in all fairness, I cannot say for sure that I would have guessed the
ending (however stupid it may be) had it not been revealed to me before
hand. However, I feel very confident that I, as well as anyone who had seen
a few "Twilight Zone" episodes, would have seen it coming a mile away. The
fact that movie-goers nation wide are surprised by the ending still has me
stumped.
Ironically, to fully appreciate the best scene (that of Cole and Malcolm
attending a little girl's funeral), the viewer is required to be aware of a
very rare psychological disorder called Munchausen Syndrome by Proxy. I
wouldn't have even known about this mental disease if I hadn't, by pure dumb
luck, caught "Dateline NBC" the other week when they did a feature story on
it.
Despite being blessed with some really amazing cinematography and a brauva
performance from Osment (where was this kid when casting calls were going
out for The Phantom Menace?), in the end, The Sixth Sense is too chalk-full
of contradictions and just isn't plausible enough to warrant even a slight
recommendation.
*Find all of Jason's reviews online at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475
**Complimentary movie ticket courtesy of Valley Cinemas at
http://www.movie-tickets.com

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
"I Still Know What You Did Last Summer" * 1/2 (out of four) 
Starring Jennifer Love Hewitt, Brandy, Mekhi Phifer, Matthew Settle,
Freddie Prinze, Jr., Jennifer Esposito, Muse Watson and Jeffrey Combs 
Rated R for violence, gore and profanity 
The first in a very long list of things wrong with "I Still Know What You
Did Last Summer" is the title. Think about it for a second. If the last
movie was called "I Know What You Did Last Summer", wouldn't the next movie
have to be "I Still Know What You Did Two Summers Ago"? If anyone working
on this movie had an I.Q. greater than five would have thought about it
logically and said, "Hey... wait a minute". But alas, the people behind
this film are obviously idiots, so I won't hold them to that. What I will
hold them to is the fact that they have a pretty bad movie on their hands,
even for a teenage slasher flick. 
I guess I'm one of the few critics who actually kind of liked the original
film (emphasis on the "kind of"). It wasn't great or anything and maybe not
even necessarily good, but at least it didn't have me glancing at my watch
every minute or so like it's sequel did. 
There are just so many problems with this movie that it's hard trying to
figure out where to start. First of all, I guess, is the setting. The movie
offers no rational reason why the film had to take place in the Bahamas,
other than the fact that the producers wanted a seaside setting. Exactly
why does the fisherman want to go through all the trouble of faking a radio
contest to get Julie James (Jennifer Love Hewitt, one of the only survivors
of the first film) and her new college buddies out to the islands before he
hacks them up? 
The movie suffers from this kind of logic all the way through. In one
scene, Julie is in a tanning booth at a deserted gym when the hooked
fisherman with the slicker comes in and seals up the booth so the damsel in
distress can't get out, no matter how hard she tries. When Julie discovers
she's going to slowly fry to death, she screams for help and her friends
come to her rescue. Now, this is all fine and dandy except for one thing;
instead of spending five minutes trying to bust open the booth, why not
just turn the freakin' thing off? 
In another scene, one of the characters, after having their significant
other all but decapitated by the man in the slicker, says to Julie, "Just
don't tell anybody it rained the whole time." Oh yeah, I've just been
terrorized by a hook wielding sociopath and had some of my best friends
gruesomely slaughtered, but hey, I'll crack jokes anyway. After all, it IS
in the script. 
The film's only saving graces are a few well-executed suspense sequences
and a really cool cameo by the "Re-Animator himself, Jeffrey Combs. He
brings some good comic relief and life to an otherwise limp movie. Way to
go , Jeffrey. 
I have a hunch that the reason this film fizzles while the first one at
least kept it's head above water is the recent absence of writer Kevin
Williamson. With "Scream" and even it's sequel, he displayed a real talent
as a screenwriter. His ear for dialogue and the terrific endings he puts on
all his films make him a standout from all the rest of the horror writers,
and I think "I Still Know" has really suffered by not having him on board.
The cool atmosphere is still there this time around, but I just didn't like
the characters or the writing as much as I did in the first one. 
Even though the movie doesn't have Williamson, it still has a hacky ending,
trying to do what Kevin did with the first two "Scream"s by (some may
consider this a spoiler, but if you have seen any horror movies whatsoever,
then you should be able to guess the identity of the madman within twenty
minutes) having two killers and, this time, having one of them being a
family member to the other. I think someone in the audience put it best
when, after the movie had ended with another "the killer is back!"
cliffhanger, he said "Who is this time, the Grandma?" 
All in all, "I Still Know" tries to be as successful as the first the film
was, but really fails in the attempt. I mean, it's okay when slasher movies
rip-off each other, but when they start copying themselves...
*Find all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475
**Complimentary movie ticket courtesy of Valley Cinemas at
http://www.movie-tickets.com

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
Starring Sean Penn, Elias Koteas, Nick Nolte, Ben Chaplin, John Cusack,
Woody Harrelson, John C. Reilly, 
Adrien Brody, Jared Leto, George Clooney and John Travolta 
Directed by Terrence Malick 
Rated R for graphic violence and profanity 
Theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1 
Released in 1998 
Running 170 minutes 
Why, oh why couldn't have they have held the release of The Thin Red Line
just one month longer? In a year that boasted the most successful and
realistic war film ever (Saving Private Ryan, in case you've been pulling a
Salinger for the past six months or so), the last thing you'd want to do is
release a poetic and surrealistic mediation on the war inside the human
soul. With the Private Ryan hype still in full swing, America just isn't
ready for that kind of ambiguity. Already drawing unfavorable comparisons
to Spielberg's film, American maverick Terrence Malick's return to the
cinema is all but doomed. 
And it really deserves better. I'm fully prepared to be shunned by the
world of film criticism for saying this, but I firmly believe that The Thin
Red Line offers a much more potent experience than Ryan. Spielberg's
version of the last great war took you inside physical battle like few
films before it ever have, but Malick's film is so haunting and lyrical in
it's delivery and imagery that, yes, I would compare it to Apocalypse Now.
Quite an analogy, I know, but it's the honest to God truth. More symbolic
than Full Metal Jacket and even more philosophical than Oliver Stone's
Platoon, it is very possibly the finest war film of the last twenty years. 
With it's first image of a crocodile slithering beneath the murk of a
swamp, symbolizing the violence and terror waiting just under the surface
of the human soul, this one doesn't burst to the screen with vivid
intensity like most battle films do. Rather, Malick chooses to establish an
overall ascetic tone and mood to the film before he confronts you with his
brutal and at times uncompromising and blood-soaked engagements of
violence. 
Actually, the movie at first feels more like a Natural Geographic
documentary than a war adventure. Presenting us with a view of nature
undisturbed by man's inhumanity to man, the film treats us to a glimpse of
native life, where a couple of AWOL U.S. troops have deserted to. After an
American battleship returns to the island to claim it's soldiers, it whisks
them off to yet another natural habitat just waiting to be disrupted, where
the remainder of The Thin Red Line is to take place. 
Here, the movie makes a sudden and, admittingly, welcome change of pace.
While Private Ryan's assault on the beach lasted twenty five minutes,
Malick goes into high-gear for no less than an hour and a half. This is
where the movie really shines; the cinematography, sound and editing are
all a spectacle to behold. But even though these ninety minutes provide
ample amounts of blood, guts and octane, Malick still upholds a strange
kind of dream-like beauty to what is going on. Much like it's obvious
predecessor Apocalypse Now, it causes the viewer to go into a trance-like
state. We realize the horror of what we are being subjected to, but it's
just so beautiful that we can't tear our eyes from it for one moment. 
Like all great films, The Thin Red Line does have it's share of flaws. Most
obviously, it's not very accessible to the average movie-goer; Saving
Private Ryan owed much of it's success to it's utter simplicity. I'm not
saying that's necessarily a bad thing; I enjoy it when a film challenges
me, but this one is so complex in it's ideas that it could very easily be
seen as an exercise in pretension. I'll even admit that it took me two
viewings to fully comprehend the full weight of the movie. 
One thing that really got to me personally was the sudden appearances of
John Travolta and George Clooney at the beginning and end of the story.
Like the bookends of Private Ryan, they jerked me out of the rhythm of the
movie. Kenneth Branagh made the same mistake with 1996's Hamlet when he
cast such stars as Robin Williams, Jack Lemmon and Billy Crystal in two
minute cameos. Casting major stars in bit parts disconnects you from the
story just long enough to make you realize that you are watching a movie,
and that can be a grave mistake at times. 
By the end of the film, though, the good things have outweighed the bad
about two million to one and make for one of the most memorable, unnerving
and effective films of 1998. 
*Homepage at http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Last Temptation of Christ, The (1988)
"The Last Temptation of Christ" (1988) 
"The Last Temptation of Christ" * * * * 
Starring Willem Dafoe, Harvey Keitel, Barbara Hershey, Harry Dean Stanton,
David Bowie, Verna Bloom, Andre Gregory, Juliette Caton, Roberts Blossom,
Irvin Kershner, Nehemiah Persoff and Barry Miller 
Directed by Martin Scorsese 
It is very rare that a film comes along and transends the way we look at
someone or something. A film that actually has the power to change the way
someone thinks. Martin Scorsese's epic masterpiece "The Last Temptation of
Christ" does just that. Watching it, you can feel that you are in the
presence of true genius and are viewing one of the most remarkable films of
our time. 
And I know what you're all thinking: is Scorsese really the right guy to
direct a film of this nature? I was thinking precisely the same thing.
Actually, he is the only one that could pull it off without seeming preachy
or making the movie contrived. When you see the movie, you'll know exactly
what I'm talking about. No other director (that I'm familiar with, anyway)
could have put as much thought or passion into this film as Scorsese has.
As any true Marty fan knows, he grew up with dreams of becoming a priest.
Fortunantly, he became a filmmaker instead but, with this, has made up for
not becoming a man of the cloth as he has intended. He has made barnone the
greatest religious or biblical movie of all time. 
Another aspect I wanted to tackle right off the bat is the argument that
this film is blasphomy. Being based on Nikos Kazantzakis' novel, it has
actually succeeded in becoming even more controversial that the material
from which it was based. The thing is this: in a scene late in the film,
there is a sexual encounter between Jesus and Mary Magdeline. Blasphomy,
right? The hook: it is not taking place in reality. It's all part of an
elaborate trick being played on Jesus by Satan, who is tempting him by
showing what his life probably would have been like if he had been born a
mortal man. Now, being the strict Christian that I am, if Scorsese had
shown this in any other light, I would not be recommending this film to the
extent that I am. But he is doing it to prove a point. It is, ultimently,
the last temptation of Christ. Satan is preying on him when he is at his
weakest; dying on the cross. 
Now that those two points are out of the way, I can discuss the film. Like
I said, a movie of this power and beauty comes along once in a blue moon.
As I hope you have already guessed, it tells the story of Jesus Christ, who
we all have been brought up to believe was a purely perfect man that did
not possess any of the human qualities that every man has; such as fear,
longing, anger, etc. If you say he had these qualities, just like anyone
else does, that is considered a sin. Why? If he was born a man, then why
shouldn't he be born with at least some of the emotional qualities that all
people have? And if he was purely perfect, then how could he have been
tempted for forty days and forty nights in the desert? God forgive me if
I'm wrong, but maybe Jesus, despite popular opinion, did have his faults
and emotions as any other person has. 
Don't get me wrong here; I am a Christian and I do believe that Jesus was a
divine human being and the son of God. So I don't want hate-mail from all
you devout Christians out there who may be reading this (what am I saying;
hardly anyone reads this, let alone devout Christians). Just wanted to get
that point across. 
I'm going to be redundant here and mention again that Scorsese was the only
person who could have directed this movie. He adds just the touch to every
scene. For instance, when Jesus trashes the temple, turning tables up and
whatnot, you can see the intensity. I don't know how else to describe it.
You can just feel it. Not just at that part, either. The night that Jesus
is to be captured, he goes to pray in the forest. Marty adds exactly the
right amount of sentimentality to the characters that it evokes certain
emotions that very few films can make come out. 
I guess that's also thanks to the wonderful performances throughout the
movie. Willem Dafoe is the perfect Christ, and Barbara Hershey makes and
wonderful Mary. But then there's the roles of Judas and Sal (Harvey Keitel
and Harry Dean Stanton, respectivly). I mean, they're great in they're
roles and all, but I just think they should have switched parts. It's
obvious that Judas was a very guilt-ridden man and that Sal was very
intense and pronounced. Now, does Keitel look guilt-ridden? Does Stanton
look intense? Hell no. They really aren't fit for their roles, but they do
a pretty good job anyway. 
There's really not a whole lot to say about the story. We all know it by
now. We've all been taught about the disciples and the last supper and all
that. But Scorsese has put a completely different spin on what has been
generally regarded as the greatest story ever told. And in every scene, you
can see that special touch that only Marty can do. 
"The Last Temptation of Christ" belongs up there with the director's other
efforts, including the brilliant "Raging Bull" or "GoodFellas". And I can
only hope that those who have so blindly dismissed it as blasphomy will
give it another look. 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
The Hurricane (1999)
Rating (out of five): ****
Starring Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Deborah Unger, Liev
Schreiber, John Hannah, Dan Hedaya, Debbi Morgan, David Paymer,
Vinny Pastore and Rod Steiger
Directed by Norman Jewison
Written by Sam Chaiton (based on a book by Rubin "Hurricane" Carter)
Rated R for violence and profanity
Theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1
Released in 1999
Running 155 minutes
The life story of boxer Rubin "Hurricane" Carter is full of so many powerful
and harrowing emotions that you'd think it would be impossible to express it
all on a movie screen. Filled to the brim with themes of hope, love,
sacrifice and courage, The Hurricane is one of the most absorbing and
spiritually uplifting movies of the year.
Denzel Washington's new film tells Carter's turbulent story in admirable
fashion, providing those of us who previously knew nothing of the Hurricane'
s plight with a wealth of fascinating insight.
How turbulent was his life, you may ask? For starters, at age eleven, Carter
was sent to a juvenile prison (and remained there for almost ten years) for
a simple act of self-defense, and in his adult life was framed for three
murders by the same police officer who haunted his childhood. But Carter
carried the title of "the Hurricane" for a reason - for the twenty years
that he was held in the custody of New Jersey state, he never submitted to
his oppressors, nor did he give up his dignity by wearing the uniform of a
convict.
While behind bars, he became friend and mentor to a troubled black youth who
read the memoirs of the wrongly-jailed boxer and was so struck by the tale
that he formed a pen pal relationship with the Hurricane. It was he, along
with a group of Canadian freedom fighters, that eventually helped to
orchestrate Carter's extradition from prison (made even more compelling by a
heated courtroom finish in which the hero must stand up to the racist legal
system that ruined his life).
Of course, who knows exactly how much of the information we are being fed is
true? Rumor has it that the real Rubin "Hurricane" Carter was not such a
pleasant guy, that the touched-up film version of his life smoothed out the
rougher edges of his personality in order to make their hero more likable
and accessible to the general public. The facts of the case have also been
accused of being slightly distorted in an attempt to fit Hollywood's
standards of a "crowd-pleaser" (indeed, the storytelling techniques can seem
a little too by-the-numbers at times).
Then again, The Hurricane never claimed to be a documentary. Employing the
concept of artistic license to its fullest potential, director Norman
Jewison (who, after In the Heat of the Night, is no stranger to films
dealing with racism) has crafted a fine picture. Aided by a stellar cast of
performers (including Washington, who just recently took home a Golden Globe
for his turn as the world-weary boxer), he has made something to move and
inspire us all.
*Find all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
Urban Legend (1998) * * * 1/2 (out of four)
Starring Jared Leto, Alicia Witt, Rebecca Gayheart, Natasha Wagner, Michael
Rosenbaum, Loretta Devine, Joshua Jackson, Tara Reid, John Neville, Robert
Englund and Brad Dourif 
Directed by Jamie Blanks 
Rated R for graphic violence and gore, profanity and suggested sex 
Theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1 
Released in 1998 
Running 99 minutes 
Urban Legend surprised me. Based on the last few films the genre has
produced (including but not exclusive to the likes of I Know What You Did
Last Summer, Disturbing Behavior and the disappointing Halloween: H20), I
was positive that I was in store for another mildly entertaining but silly
and ultimately boring rehash of the Scream phenomena. Thankfully, Legend
rose above it's soggy premise to become not only a hip, scary and stylish
entertainment, but also what will probably become one of the best films of
the year. 
You're all familiar with the plot; a bunch of overly horny teenagers get
systematically slaughtered by a masked maniac who's identity is not
revealed until the closing moments of the film when it turns out to be, you
guessed it; everybody's favorite veteran of the whodunit flicks...the only
person you didn't suspect! 
However, just because Legend doesn't really break any new ground as far as
literary or even technical achievements go does not mean that it can't
qualify as first-class entertainment. It was, believe it or not, one of the
funnest times I've had at the movies all year. 
The thing is, I'm not really sure what made this particular stab (pardon
the pun) at the genre seem so fresh and alive. Maybe it was the above-par
performances by the movie's two leads (Jared Leto and "Cybil" actress
Alicia Witt). Or, it could have been the on- target direction by Jamie
Blanks. More likely, though, it was because of the inspired premise. I
don't think I need to tell you that a killer hacking people up ala urban
folklore is much more frightening than a killer fisherman. 
Urban Legend begins with a sequence that reminded me of the classic Scream
opener, not so much in plotting as in attention to detail that makes for an
absolutely chilling teaser for the rest of the film. A pretty young coed is
driving down a deserted road when (gasp!) a gas problem (hee-hee) forces
her to stop at an equally deserted gas station for a refill. One problem,
though. Would you want to stop at a station run by Brad Dourif? I thought
not. Predictably, the attendant ends up coaxing her into the main building
to sort out a problem with the credit card company. It's odd, though, when
you pick up a phone to realize that nobody's on the other line. Naturally,
the potential victim escapes into her car and drives off. And the when we
least expect it...WHACK!!! A decapitation. It turns out that the creepy
looking attendant was just trying to warn her about the maniac in the back
seat of the car. 
So who is it this time? The obvious candidate is the slightly off-kilter
professor at the college the girl went to (none other than Freddy Kruger
himself, Robert Englund), who teaches a class on urban legends. A-ha. Or
could it be the fame-hungry local journalist (Leto) looking for a meaty
story to put on his resume? Like all movies of this nature, one of the
chief pleasures is trying to guess whodunit. And it turns out to be, of
course, the one you didn't suspect. 
I'm not going to pretend Urban Legend is anything more than it is, but I
must give credit where credit is due. And this flick definitely deserves
credit for being what not many other recent horror films have been...fun. 
*Complimentary movie ticket courtesy of Valley Cinemas in Lodi, CA
Get all of Jason Wallis' movie reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
Starring John Travolta, Samuel L. Jackson, Uma Thurman, Harvey Keitel, Tim
Roth, Amanda Plummer, Maria de Medeiros, Ving Rhames, Eric Stoltz, Rosanna
Arquette, Christopher Walken, Bruce Willis and Quentin Tarantino
Directed by Quentin Tarantino
     When Quentin Tarantino made "Pulp Fiction", he was not only making the
greatest film of the 90s; he was also making what I believe to be the most
influential movie of all time.  But before you send me hate-mail for not
giving that title to "Citizen Kane", hear me out.
     Much like "Citizen Kane", "Pulp Fiction" has changed movie making
forever.  But I think the latter has had a tad more impact.  "Pulp Fiction"
has actually ushered in a new era of film making.  It has altered the way
films will be viewed.  "Fiction" has spawned so many imitations, I've lost
count.  Sure, some have been excellent ("Bound" and "The Usual Suspects"
spring immediately to mind), but any serious movie-goer recognizes "Pulp
Fiction" as the original neo-noir of the 90s.  In this review, I hope to
change all the people's minds who have criticized it for it's excessive
profanity and violence (which, by the way, isn't really that graphic).  
     The most brilliant aspect of Tarantino's masterpiece is the
screenplay.  It is filled with so much classic dialogue (the "Quarter
Pounder with Cheese" speech will go down in history), it should be required
reading for any film student, if it isn't already.  
     The story (told in unorthodox non-linear format) centers around three
main episodes, all of which eventually intertwine.  The first, titled
"Vincent Vega and Marcellus Wallace's Wife", deals with a very loaded John
Travolta (I forgot to mention the cool heroin shoot-up sequence) taking Mia
Wallace (a star-making performance by Uma Thurman), his bosses wife, out on
a date to a cool 50s restaurant called Jack Rabbit Slim's.  They talk for a
while (with the occasional "uncomfortable silence"), mostly about a guy
called Tony Rocky Horror.  After giving Marcellus' new bride a foot
massage, he was thrown off a building and into a greenhouse, giving him a
"speech impediment".  They also partake in a cool dance contest and end up
twisting to the Chuck Berry classic "You Never Can Tell".  I won't reveal
the rest of the story, but I'll definitely say that it turns out to be a
real bummer of a night, despite the cool trophy they win.
     The second story (the least of the three but still four stars) stars
Bruce Willis (proving he can play someone other than John McClain in the
"Die Hard" flicks) as boxer Butch Coolidge.  Previously in the film (like I
said, it's told in non-linear form), he had made a deal with Marcellus
Wallace that he would take a fall in a match.  As it turns out, he not only
doesn't take the fall, but he ends up actually killing his opponent.  He
takes a cab to his half-witted girlfriend's apartment, and to make a
long story short, ends up going back to his own place to retrieve a gold
watch, sort of a family heirloom explained by Christopher Walken in a
hilarious flash-back sequence.  On his way home, he bumps into (literally)
Marcellus.  The two winde up prisoner to two hillbilly sex murderers, which
results in the infamous "Gimp" scene, which is very reminicent of the
"squeal like a pig!" scene from "Deliverance".
     The last (and best, in my opinion) of the episodes features John
Travolta (again) and Samuel L. Jackson (in the best performance of any
supporting actor ever) as two slightly off-kilter hitmen trying to rid
themselves of a bloody car.  They seek help with a friend of Jackson's
(played by the Q-man himself), desperately in need of a Stress Ball.  They
end up calling a "cleaner" of sorts, played by the god among men Harvey
Keitel, to help them out.  In the end, the story brilliantly loops around
itself, actually ending where it began.
     If you haven't already seen the film (or even if you have, for that
matter), I suggest you invest your money in a copy of the letterbox
collectors edition.  It features two previously unreleased scenes and the
original film restored how it was originally meant to be seen.  Earlier
today, I bought this version and watched it a few hours ago.  What the
pan-and-scan did to this movie is inexcusable.  That version cut out, like,
half the movie.  What I have missed in the past years of viewing this flick
is amazing.  For instance, when Travolta and Jackson are in the apartment
near the end, the widescreen version allows you to see that several things
on the walls make crosses.  This might help explain the divine intervention
that takes place.  Just a theory...
     One of the things that pisses people off so much about this movie is
that Tarantino borrowed alot of scenes from other movies (i.e. "Psycho"
"Kiss Me Deadly", "Deliverance", etc.).  But why shouldn't he?  It's not
like he out-right and blatantly stole.  Give the guy a break.
     In case you haven't already noticed, I believe "Pulp Fiction" is a
supremely excellent film and one of the best of all time (up there with
such greats as "Casablanca" and "The Godfather").  Trust me, you will not
see a better film come out of the 90s.  And besides, it's one hell of a
ride.
Note: If anyone knows how I could get a "Bad Motherfucker" wallet,
please e-mail me.  Any help would be greatly appreciated.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me
Rating (out of five): **
Starring Mike Myers, Heather Graham, Michael York, Robert Wagner, Rob Lowe,
Seth Green, Mindy Sterling, Verne Troyer, Will Farrell, Kristen Johnston
and Elizabeth Hurley
Directed by M. Jay Roach
Written by Myers and Michael McCullers
Rated PG-13 for sexual and, at times, very crude humor
Theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1
Released in 1999
Running 95 minutes
If only Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me had been just half as
original, zany, silly and totally enjoyable as its predecessor, it would
have easily been one of this summer's biggest pleasures. If only. In fact,
The Spy Who Shagged Me is the exact opposite of the original; instead of
refreshing the audience with one clever parody after another, the filmmakers
bombard us with used-up, tired jokes taken directly from the first one.
Take the scene where Austin Powers (again played by Mike Myers, but with
only a fraction of the giddy enthusiasm he displayed previously) confronts a
henchmen on the side of a cliff. After being pushed off the ravine, the bad
guy is of course assumed dead. But suddenly, we hear a pleading voice coming
from down below; he's only injured. A similar scene played very well in the
original International Man of Mystery, but here I was insulted by it. Did
the filmmakers really believe the audience would laugh at a rip-off?
Apparently I overestimated the intelligence of the average movie-goer,
considering that the film has pulled in over $200 million in domestic
theatrical grosses alone. Do I hear the sound of a franchise heading our
way?
Having said that, though, I still cannot deny the film its merits. The basic
plot was delightfully silly enough to sustain my interest somewhat; Dr. Evil
(Mike Myers, in the second of his three roles), having constructed a time
machine, goes back to the year 1969 in an attempt to snatch Austin Power's
"mojo" (don't you just love that word?) whilst he is cryogenically frozen.
When Austin gets wind of this (after a great intro explaining the absence of
Elizabeth Hurley's Vanessa Kensington) , he too travels back in time to
re-claim his sexual drive, accompanied by the hot-to-trot Felicity Shagwell,
played by Heather Graham. This sounds stupid, I know, but in the movie it
starts to make some kind of weird, off-the-wall sense, and it worked for me.
Then there's Mini-Me (Verne Troyer), a... petite clone of Myer's Dr. Evil,
exactly 1/8 in size. Troyer's persona alone gains the film an extra
half-star, contributing to one particularly hilarious scene where he
attempts to nibble on his own Mini-Mr. Bigglesworth. Just try to ignore the
fact that, at 2'8'', he would make Dr. Evil's height rise to just over 21
feet. No matter.
However, there are only about four hearty laughs throughout the entire hour
and a half (the most notable being the now infamous tent scene), and that
just isn't enough to warrant even a minor recommendation. If there is in
fact an "Austin Powers 3", they should just kill off secret agent Powers and
put the emphasis on Dr. Evil and Mini-Me. Unconventional, yes, but there's
no denying that it'd make for a better movie.
*Find all of Jason's reviews online at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475
**Complimentary movie ticket courtesy of Valley Cinemas at
http://www.movie-tickets.com

Title
Review for Leaving Las Vegas (1995)
"Leaving Las Vegas" * * * * (out of four)
Starring Nicolas Cage, Elizabeth Shue and Julian Sands
Directed by Mike Figgis
     Some movies have such an impact that they linger in your mind long
after the credits have rolled, making you think carefully and recollect on
what you have just seen.  I finished Mike Figgis' "Leaving Las Vegas" hours
ago, and it is still as haunting as when I hit rewind on the VCR.
     Alot of people refer to this film as "that flick where Nick Cage plays
that alcoholic dude".  "Leaving Las Vegas" is not so much a movie about
alcoholism as it is a story about two people who except each other for what
they are: a drunk and a whore.
     Ben (Nicolas Cage in possibly the best male performance of the past
twenty years) is the drunk.  His family and friends have long since abandon
him, and all he has left is his liquor.  In a scene early in the film, we
see Ben staggering into a resteraunt, looking for a "friend" of his to
mooch some money off of.  He finds the guy (Richard Lewis) having dinner
with a buddy and two chicks, trying to crack witty jokes that just come out
stupid.  When Ben approaches the table, you can clearly sense that everyone
immediatly feels uncomfortable.  After Lewis gives Ben the money, he coldly
says "I think it would be best if you didn't contact me again."  Now even
though through the course of the film, some much more depressing things
happen, this is when I felt the most for Ben.  There was such a look of
sorrow and dispare on his face, (not to sound hokey or anything) it almost
brought a tear to my eye.
     It turns out that Ben was once a semi-successful Hollywood player, and
apparently a pretty popular guy.  Now he spends his time getting robbed by
hookers and trying desperatly to pick up women, not so much for the sex,
but for the company; for someone to talk to or spend time with.  
     Once he is fired from his job, Ben decides to burn all his belongings,
collect all his cash and relocate to Las Vegas to slowly drink himself to
death.
     One night he runs into a prostitute (a brilliant performance by
Elizabeth Shue - how far she has come since "Adventures in Babysitting")
named Sera.  She is involved in an abusive relationship with her pimp, a
scumbag who gets-off by cutting her.  They are both very lonely,
self-destructive people.  They immediatly hit it off, both of them
realizing that they need one another.  And it isn't even a sexual
relationship.  They don't even have sex until, like, the last ten minutes
of the film.
     "Leaving Las Vegas" is not a film about plot.  With the exception of
what I have already revealed (which all happens in the first thirty minutes
or so, by the way), there isn't too much of a story to it.  It is more a
film about people and how they react to one another.
     From what I can see, this is basically a perfect film.  The direction
is great (with Mike Figgis doing a brilliant mix between the glamor of Las
Vegas and the moody, smokey atmosphere of a film noir) and it contains two
of the best performances to come out of the 90s, or any other decade for
that matter.  But don't go rushing out to see this movie without knowing
what you're getting yourself into.  First off, if you are easily offended
by frank sexual dialouge, stay away from "Leaving Las Vegas".  It is filled
with lengthy discussions of orgasms, rape and various forms of perverted
activities involving burbon (that's right).  Secondly, if you are not in
the mood to see a very depressing film, don't see it.  
     However, if you are cool with those two things, you are in for one of
the most memorable experiences you will ever have.

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
Fight Club
Rating (out of five): ****1/2
Starring Edward Norton, Brad Pitt, Helena Bonham Carter, Meat Loaf, Jared
Leto and Zach Grenier
Directed by David Fincher
Written by Jim Uhls (based on the novel by Chuck Palahniuk)
Rated R for violence, profanity, sexual situations and subliminal nudity
Theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1
Released in 1999
Running 139 minutes
For years, director David Fincher has been turning out some of the most
stylish and inventive thrillers to ever hit American screens. In spite of
critical and public backlash, his Alien 3 remains the most technically
interesting of that series, and Se7en stands as the suspense film upon which
all other modern suspense films are gauged. With The Game, he proved himself
more than a one-movie-wonder and emerged as one of the most original
filmmakers working in Hollywood. Which brings us to Fight Club, Fincher's
most unnerving and stylized outing yet.
By now, anyone who follows the entertainment business by even a slight
degree has heard of the controversy surrounding Fincher's latest. With most
publicists focusing on the film's unflinchingly violent and blood-soaked
fight scenes, most viewers would be led to believe (myself included) that
it's nothing more than a handful of starkly realistic bar brawls, and
nothing you couldn't see during one night at your local pub.
Well, take all that you think you know about Fight Club and leave it at the
theater door. With as many twists and turns as Se7en and The Game put
together, this is a wholly exuberant and unique experience, and not at all
what you would expect from the previews. Yes, there are numerous graphic
depictions of bare-knuckled fist fights, but they are never exploitive or
glorifying at all, contrary to what you probably have heard. Whilst the
participants in the fight are crying tears of joy and sharing a supposed
male-bonding experience by letting there killer instincts surface, us
movie-goers in the audience are busy wincing at the notion of such
bloodshed. Unlike most Hollywood action pictures that make violence look
exhilarating, Fight Club, if anything, sets to rest any desire you have to
get in a fight; it ain't pretty.
Edward Norton stars as a conformed, white-collar working man who finds this
out too late. Never given a name (let's call him Jack), he symbolizes the
corporate everyman, so choked by his own mundane existence that he often
gets the primal urge to tear free from his barriers (in some extended quips,
Norton, as narrator, makes some of the most blistering comments on modern
consumer life since the great monologues in Trainspotting). And tears free
he does, once he hooks up with a mysterious figure named Tyler Durden (Brad
Pitt), a soap manufacturer, theater projectionist and part-time waiter. With
his anecdotes of splicing frames of pornography into family films and
masturbating into fresh clam chowder, it becomes clear that Durden is the
exact counterpart to Jack; a laid-back anarchist who has plans of,
eventually, actually doing something about uptight mindless masses and
setting the world free of itself.
After getting into a rumble with Jack (and liking the effects), he devises
Fight Club, an underground organization consisting exclusively of men who
come together a few times a week to, without any loftier purpose, beat each
other to a bloody pulp. What better way to rage against society's standards
and explore yourself, eh? Soon, Fight Club evolves into something much
larger, something that Jack no longer has even a small amount of control
over. What is Tyler really up to? Is there more to the guy than first meets
the eye?
There's so much more to discuss here and many more subplots to get into
(notice I haven't once made mention of Helena Bonham Carter's character?),
but doing so would inevitably detract from your Fight Club experience. That
said, I do think it's pretty safe to say that the film is much more powerful
and profound than the basic plot outline would suggest. In addition to the
natural instincts of man, Fight Club also delves into such topics as
manipulation, cultism, communism, fascism and even the psychosemantics of
the human id and ego, and explores them all equally, all the while
sustaining the excitement and hyper-kinetics of an effective thriller. I
could have done with a less ambiguous ending (which accounts for the
subtraction of a half-star), but as it stands, Fight Club is bound to rank
as one of the year's best.
*Find all of Jason's reviews online at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475
**Complimentary movie ticket courtesy of Valley Cinemas at
http://www.movie-tickets.com

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
"Scream" * * * * 
Starring Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, David Arquette, Matthew Lillard, Drew
Barrymore, Rose McGowen, Skeet Ulrich and Henry Winkler 
Directed by Wes Craven 
"Scream" begins with one of the best edited and most frightening scenes
ever put on film. In it's opening, we are introduced to Drew Barrymore
(with a cool new cut), playing a teen home alone, ready to cook up some
popcorn and relax with a nice little horror flick. All of a sudden, the
phone rings; she answers it, not knowing that on the other end is a
blood-thirsty psychopath. He playfully flirts with her, always keeping a
frighteningly monotone voice. When he asks her name, she asks why he wants
to know. His response: because I want to know who I'm looking at. Terror
ensues. 
Now, if you want to see this flick because of Drew, don't even bother
because she, needless to say, gets done away with in the first fifteen
minutes. Quite gruesomely, I might add. But the violence in this film is
not mean-spirited gore as in such shockers as "Friday the 13th" and the
like. Because the film is so campy and self aware of itself, all the
violence is justified. But, tho a tad on the violent side, "Scream" does
not contain a gratuitous amount of gore. We only think we see it. It has
potential to be much, much gorier. But it isn't, and that's one of the
reasons why it's so much fun to watch. Director Wes Craven finds the
perfect balance between buckets of blood and no violence at all. In other
words, it's done with some taste. 
Anyway, let me get back to the point. Most modern horror flicks concentrate
on the gross-out factor and try to out-do each other on how much female
nudity you can squeeze into one film. Most also feature very bland
characters. In "Scream", the actors add just the right amount of charisma
to their characters. Special kudos to Matthew Lillard, who plays Stu
(possibly the coolest guy in the history of cinema). Matt doesn't make Stu
just another horny teenager; he adds something special that makes him
different from the rest. I may be going out on a limb here (correction: I
know I am), but I think this is the performance that should have captured
last year's Oscar for Best Supporting Actor (Cuba was good and all, but he
didn't make an unforgettable character like Matt Lillard did. I mean, "show
me the money"? Gimme a break). But don't get me wrong; there were other
deserving performances (particularly Dwight Yokham's awesome portrayle of
an abusive boyfriend in "Sling Blade" - but that's for another review), but
none did as great of a job as Lillard. 
It is extremely refreshing to see a movie like this; a fun, scary, well
executed (no pun intended) and incredibly enjoyable slasher flick. The plot
of the movie is simple: a crazed sociopath has seen one to many scary
movies and is now going around dressed as Father Death (one of the scariest
costumes since Michael's mask in "Halloween") picking off teen after teen.
His first victim (Drew Barrymore) went to a high school with a principal
non other than the Fonz himself, Henry Winkler. The killer begins to
terrorize a handful of students from that school, particularly
concentrating on Neve Campbell (who has a boyfriend barring a striking
resemblance to Johnny Depp from Craven's other masterpiece, "A Nightmare on
Elm Street"). 
I will not say anything more because that would be giving away the movie,
and I wouldn't even dream of doing that. The main thing that makes "Scream"
different from all those other horror flicks is that it works on two
levels. First of all, like I said, it is a splendid slasher film. Secondly,
it is an excellent homage to other horror movies (i.e. "Prom Night",
"Halloween", etc.). There's probably about fifty in-jokes in the first hour
alone. But "Scream" is far more than mere homage; it stands on it's own as
being one of the greatest horror films of all time; and I mean up there
with great flicks like "Psycho" and "Dawn of the Dead". And I don't just
mean as far as mindless entertainment goes. It really is a magnificently
crafted take on the thriller genre. In other words, check it out. It's one
of my personal faves. 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Se7en (1995)
"Se7en" * * * * 
Starring Morgen Freeman, Brad Pitt, Gwyneth Paltrow, Kevin Spacey, R. Lee
Ermey and Richard Roundtree 
Directed by David Fincher 
It is very rare that you find a good serial killer flick. The only one I
can think of is "Silence of the Lambs" (of course, I haven't seen "Henry:
Portrait of a Serial Killer" as of yet). Whenever someone tries to make one
intelligently, they end up failing miserably (just look at the crap-fest
that is "Copycat"). 
This is exactly why David Fincher's masterpiece "Se7en" is so refreshing.
Lately, America has been bombarded with immature slasher flicks that
disguise themselves as "thrillers". Each one is exactly the same: more
guts, more gore, more horny teenagers, etc. Well, "Se7en" definently
derveres being called a thriller because (gasp!) it actually thrills. 
When talking about how great this film is, the first thing that springs to
mind is the performances. We all know Morgen Freeman is one of the better
actors of the 90s. It seems that each film he makes is better than the
last. In 1994, with "The Shawshank Redemption", he delivered one of the
most brilliant performance I have seen since the early days of Jack
Nicholson. And it is safe to say that in "Se7en", he gives his best effort
yet. High praise should also be given to Brad Pitt and Kevin Spacey for
their also-excellent performances. I mean, I was shocked that Brad could
actually act (but, I guess he proved that with "12 Monkeys", didn't he?). 
Then there's the story. Freeman plays Lieutenant Somerset, a
super-intelligent (I mean, the guy plays chess, hangs out in libraries and
falls asleep to a metradome!), world-weary, Dante-reading detective, tired
of all the crime and suffering that surrounds him every day. With his
retirement only a week or so away, he plans to move out to the country,
work on his house, and do everything else you can't do in a big city. 
Fairly early on (about five minutes, actually), Detective Mills (Brad Pitt)
enters the picture. Mills is a cocky little bastard who thinks he knows
everything just because he worked Homicide five years upstate. So,
naturally, Somerset does not take an instant liking to him. 
The two are called to the scene of a grisly crime: a very obesse man has
been found dead in his kitchen, apparently force-fed to death. The cops
seem to think it was just some crazy guy who wanted to torture poor ol'
porky to death. But after another body is found, murdered in equally
bizarre fashion, the two detectives discover that the killings are
connected and are the work of a serial killer, bent on murdering according
to the seven deadly sins (which, by the way, are gluttany, greed, sloth,
lust, pride, envy and wrath). As Somerset says, "You can expect five more."
But "Se7en" does not turn out the way you think it is going to. And,
despite what some people say, it is not just an excuse to show bizarre
deaths. On the contrary, it is a truly superb film, easily one of the best
to be released in the past ten years. 
However, there are many people who will not want to see this movie. Tho the
violence is not too graphic, the subject matter is extremely disturbing. I
mean, this is the kind of film that could totally jar your psyche. But if
you have the stomache to take it, "Se7en" is one of the greatest films of
the 90s and also one of my favorites (I'm talking top ten or twenty here).
I give it one of my highest recommendations. 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Fantasia/2000 (1999)
Fantasia 2000
Rating (out of five): ***1/2
Starring Mickey Mouse, Donald Duck, Daisy Duck, James Earl Jones, Quincy
Jones, Angela Lansbury, Steve Martin, Bette Midler and Leopold Stokowski
Directed by Don Hahn, Pixote Hunt, Hendel Butoy, Eric Goldberg, James Algar,
Francis Glebas and Gaetan and
Paul Brizzi
Written by Hahn, Irene Mecchi and David Reynolds
Rated G (suitable for all ages)
Theatrical aspect ratio of 1.33:1
Released in 1999
Running 75 minutes
In 1940, Walt Disney and company released what would come to be known as one
of the definitive movie musicals; a spectacular, awe-inspiring blend of
classical music set in time to striking animated visuals. Their masterwork,
aptly titled Fantasia, was originally slated to be a work in progress,
containing something new each time it was presented to the viewing public.
While this idea didn't exactly pan-out (in fact, Fantasia bombed upon
initial release), Disney has made the wise decision to put together another
assortment of animation to ring in the new millennium, this time taking
advantage of modern technology and presenting Fantasia 2000 on IMAX screens
across the nation.
Now, anyone who has ever seen an IMAX movie before is well aware of what
they are in store for. With the screen over seven stories high, seeing
something like Fantasia 2000 ala IMAX isn't so much a movie-going experience
as it is an event.
And thankfully, Disney has chosen some material worthy of such technology.
While the seven new animated segments vary in quality (ranging from mediocre
to masterpiece status), the overall effect of the film is quite
intoxicating. In fact, Fantasia 2000 features a piece of animation set to
George Girshwin's "Rhapsody in Blue" that is so brilliantly structured and
delightfully magical that all I could do was sit in my seat with a
child-like grin on my face for the duration of its running time.
However, a couple of the sequences are so tired and contrived that it's a
wonder how they made it into the film in the first place (especially the
grueling "Pines of Rome" flying-whale piece).
In addition to the seven new shorts, Disney has also decided to include a
popular piece from the original Fantasia titled "The Sorcerer's Apprentice",
in which Mickey Mouse goes head-to-head with an army of mischievous brooms.
While the notion to include this, one of the finest works of animation the
world has ever seen, was undoubtedly a stroke of genius, it would be an
understatement to say the Mickey suffers in the IMAX format. With grain
spots the size of my fist filling the screen, it's difficult (and sometimes
impossible) to make out the fine details the artists spent so much time
putting into "The Sorcerer's Apprentice".
Thus, Fantasia 2000 doesn't quite live up to the liveliness and
inventiveness of the original. Still, the majority of the segments work very
well, particularly the "Rhapsody in Blue" sequence. It will go down as one
of the finest works the Disney studio has ever developed, and even alone
would warrant an enthusiastic recommendation.
*Find all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Vita  bella, La (1997)
I remember hearing about this film when it first appeared at Cannes over a
year ago, picking up the Grand Jury Prize at the festival. 'Holocaust
comedy receives standing ovation', the headlines read. Intrigued by this
statement, I looked up information on the film and found that, sure enough,
Life is Beautiful is in fact a comedy about the greatest atrocity of the
last thousand years. Even though the movie was extremely well-received by
critics and public alike, I couldn't help but be disgusted at this notion;
human tragedy is not something I feel should be celebrated. 
Only now do I see the error of my ways. After finally viewing the film for
myself after avoiding it for some time, it became clear that it is not, as
the headlines proclaimed, a "Holocaust comedy"; on the contrary, Life is
Beautiful does not even really depict the graphic events that took place in
Nazi deathcamps. Rather, it focuses on the relationship between a father
and his son, who he is trying desperately to shield from the horrors of
their situation. 
Roberto Benigni (who also wrote and directed the movie) stars as Guido
Orefice, a Chaplin-inspired clown and all round jolly guy who, as the film
opens, is vying for the affections of an attractive school teacher
(Nicoletta Braschi, Benigni real life spouse). Through the course of the
first hour or so, we see Guido striving to get the attention of this
"beautiful princess", as he calls her. Employing the magic of laughter, the
Italian comedian wins her heart and together, they raise a young boy named
Giosue (child actor Giorgio Cantarini). Life treats them well until
Hitler's minions rise to power, and the family is whisked away to a German
camp, where Guido becomes convinced that he must upholds his son's
innocence no matter what the sacrifice. 
Granted, it contains some uproariously funny moments both in and out of the
concentration camp, but it does not pull a "Hogan's Heros" and make light
of the slaughtering of some six million innocent Jews. Somehow, it achieves
hilarity without disrespecting it's gravely serious subject. 
So, we've established that Life is Beautiful is not a "Holocaust comedy".
But, there is another complete misrepresentation of this material that
really disturbs me. The film, despite critic's declarations of it being a
"triumph of the human spirit", is no such thing; not in my eyes, anyway.
Some have called the story an "affirmation of the beauty of life", but I
say it is a very dark and bleak statement about man's capability of denial
masquerading as an endearing comedy. The film's ending has been recognized
as the most entirely uplifting moment of any film released recently, but I
found it to be truly discerning and upsetting. Essentially, Life is
Beautiful is quite possibly the greatest hoax in the history of film.
However, I am not denying the movie's greatness. Believe me, it's
fantastic. I'm just saying that I think Benigni did something different
than what most people are interpreting it as. 
But perhaps I'm reading more into the movie than is really there. Maybe the
film's brilliance relies on the idea that the viewer can interpret the
meaning of it in any way they see fit. In fact, maybe Roberto Benigni has
made a film that is the sole argument for the old saying that you get out
of a movie exactly what you put into it. 
*Homepage at http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475
**Complimentary video cassette courtesy of Miramax Films at  
http://www.miramax.com

Title
Review for Exotica (1994)
"Exotica" * * * * (out of four)
Starring Bruce Greenwood, Mia Kirshner, Don McKellar, Arsinee Khanjian,
Elias Koteas, Sarah Polley, Victor Garber and David Hemblen
Directed by Atom Egoyan
     I first saw this independently made Canadian import a few months ago
after reading by several critics that it was one of the very finest films
to come out of it's year.  I had also read in Roger Ebert's review that it
featured a great surprise ending.  So I went to the video store, checked
out a copy and then went home to watch it, all ready to watch an
unpredicable mystery/thriller with a huge twist ending in the vein of "The
Usual Suspects" or "No Way Out".  An hour and forty-five minutes later, I
was sitting there watching the credits of "Exotica" roll across the screen,
thinking "What the hell was that?!".  I gave it about two stars.  I didn't
really care about any of the characters and was really let-down by the
ending.
     A few nights ago I was wandering the ailes of my local friendly
Hollywood Video and came across the movie box.  I picked it up, read it and
then decided to give it another chance.  Man, am I glad I did.
     I guess I was just so wrapped up in trying to find the clues to this
so-called "surprise ending" that I paid very little attention to the
narritive.  Viewing it again (this time actually paying attention to the
story), I found "Exotica" to be not only one of the most intriguing,
stimulating (no, not like that), provocative and just plain brilliant films
of it's year, but also one of the most fantastic flicks of all time.
     And as for the "surprise ending", I guess you could call it a twist,
but, as I said, it's not at all a "Usual Suspects" kind of thing; it's just
a revalation that is made about the past relationships of three key
characters.  Nothing more, so don't make the mistake that I made and ruin
the film trying to guess it.  It's no biggie.
     One of the great qualities of Atom Egoyan's masterpiece "Exotica"
(which, in case you were wandering, is not a porn flick) is the utter
simplicity of it's storyline.  You have five major characters.  Francis
(excellent performance by Bruce Greenwood of UPN's short-lived, underrated
"Nowhere Man") is a very troubled IRS agent with a tragic past.  He goes to
the strip club Exotica (hence the title) every other night to watch one of
the dancers put on a private show for him ("Five dollars is all it takes,
genlemen, for them to show you the mysteries of their world" barks the DJ).
 His particular choice every night is a "young piece of jailbait" (again,
the DJ) named Christina.  But Francis does not watch her for mere sexual
arousal.  They have a much deeper relationship; she is his angel.  He is
constantly asking her how anyone could hurt her, how anyone could take her
away from him.  It's very touching, actually, once Egoyan shows his full
hand and everything that has come before snaps into focus.
     However, "Exotica" is about much more than a relationship between a
stripper and an IRS agent.  On the contrary, it (along with a small handful
of other films like Bergman's "Cries and Whispers" or Scorsese's "Raging
Bull") manages to key into some very sensitive and profound human emotions
like our wants, out needs, our desires and, ultimently, our fears.
     I guess what I'm trying to say is that "Exotica" effected me like no
other film has in a long, long time.  It sweeps you up and takes you on a
dark, depressing, distrubing, but always rewarding ride and never lets up
until the last final scene when everything is finally explained and you
feel as though you know a little more the human soul than you did starting
the movie.
     Unlike many movies lately, Egoyan has made a film with a great deal to
say.  Important things.  And I'm glad I finally listened.

Title
Review for Chasing Amy (1997)
"Chasing Amy" * * * * (out of four)
Starring Ben Affleck, Joey Lauren Adams, Jason Lee, Dwight Ewell, Kevin
Smith and Jason Mewes
Directed by Kevin Smith
     Usually, when naming the greatest romantic comedies of all time, films
like "It Happened One Night" or "Annie Hall" spring immediatly to mind.  Of
all the discussions I've had with people regarding this genre, not once has
Kevin Smith's brilliant "Chasing Amy" come up.  My question is this: why? 
This one of the most perfect films I have ever had the pleasure of seeing. 
If there is one problem with most movies in the 90s, it's that alot of them
have characters that we really don't give a rat's ass about.  But with
"Chasing Amy", Kevin Smith has created no less than three of the most
memorible characters in recent cinema.  
     Holden (Ben Affleck), an intelligent, down-to-earth comic book artist
with a very insecure and immature best friend, Banky (Jason Lee, worthy of
a Best Supporting Actor Oscar nomination come Feburary).  Together, they
make a comic series called "Bluntman and Chronic", supposedly based on Jay
and Silent Bob (Jason Mewes and Kevin Smith, respectivly), characters who
pop up in all of Smith's films.  
     The film begins at a comic book convention in New York, where Holden
and Banky are autographing copies of their books and listenting to some Q&A
for a fellow artist, Hooper X (Dwight Ewell), an apparently wacked-out
Black Panther wannabe.  This results in possibly the funniest moment in any
film of the 90s as they argue and fight about whether or not the "Star
Wars" trilogy were films trying to bring down the black man.  Hooper X
pulls out a gun and pretends to shoot Banky, making all the fans run
screaming out of the building.
     As it turns out, Hooper is actually a friend of Holden and Banky's and
is not even a dangerous nutcase at all.  On the contrary, he is only a
gentle gay black man who just does this kind of stuff for publicity.  It is
little touches of humor like this opening that makes this film as memorable
as it is.
     Soon, Hooper introduces them to Alyssa (Joey Lauren Adams - another
Oscar worthy performance), yet another comic artist.  Ben and her really
hit it off well and even go out for drinks afterwards while Hooper and
Banky search for "Archie" comics so Banky can prove beyond a shadow of a
doubt that Archie was not Jughead's bitch and was by no means having sex
with Mr. Weatherby.  Meanwhile, Holden is falling head over heels for
Alyssa, who, unbeknownst to him, is (gasp!) a lesbian.  How's that for a
plot?
     Well, he finds out the next night when Alyssa starts making out with
another chick (in by far the best lesbian kiss since "Bound").  But Alyssa
doesn't see why, just 'cause they can't have sex, they can't be friends. 
So the two start hanging out alot together and we can gradually see Alyssa
making her mutation from lesbian to straight woman.
     I will say no more because part of the magic of "Chasing Amy" is
letting the story unfold before you.  And like I said, the main reason why
this is such a great film is that it has three terrific, fascinating main
characters.  I mean, Banky is probably the coolest, most hillarious person
to come out of recent cinema.   And as for Joey Lauren Adams (one of the
hottest women living, in my opinion - but she does have a bad, whiny voice
that sounds kinnda like Jennifer Tilly with larengitus; but that's okay), I
think if she gets the right scripts, she could be the next Sanrda Bullock,
except she can actually act and not just show off her cute little butt.
     I guess what I'm trying to say is that this film spoke to me like no
other romance has before.  Even though they have different sexual
preferences (or the same; it all depends on how you look at it), we can
still see that these two people belong together.  And even though it
doesn't have the happiest ending in the world, it is a very touching film
and easily the best to come out of 1997 so far.  I seriously doubt that you
will see a better film all year.

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
"Primary Colors" * * * * (out of four)
Starring John Travolta, Emma Thompson, Billy Bob Thornton, Kathy Bates,
Adrian Lester, Maura Tierney and Larry Hagman 
Directed by Mike Nichols 
Rated R for frequent profanity and mature themes 
Running 140 minutes 
As good a film as Mike Nichols' new political comedy "Primary Colors" is, I
think it is very likely that many people will find it somewhat
dissapointing. The reason for this is simple: it is not nearly as satirical
and vicious as people will be expecting from a movie mocking President
Clinton. So let's get one thing straight right off the bat; if you want to
see a film in the nature of "Dr. Strangelove" or "Network", filled with
blistering social comment, don't see this movie. 
Having said that, I still believe this is a superb movie (perhaps because I
wasn't expecting it to be biting political commentary) that takes what
could have turned out as a run-of-the-mill, "Saturday Night Live"-esque
spoof of Clinton and turned it into a fascinating, soft-hearted look into
what it would probably be like being involved in a political campaign. Is
it as great as the films I mentioned above? Of course not. Those are
timeless classics. But when being judged as an informative comedy about the
inner-workings of politics, it really comes off as quite an exceptional
film. 
The story, of course, revolves around the presidential campaign of Gov.
Jack Stanton (an obvious representation of Bill Clinton), a dim-witted but
smooth talking and good hearted good 'ol southern boy, more intersted in
eating apple fritters than making public appearences. And you can't really
have a character based on Clinton without having him screw around with
other women besides his wife, can you? So, naturally, he has sex behind his
wife's back with virtually anything that moves (it's nice to finally have
some realism in mainstream movies, isn't it?). His wife (Emma Thompson,
flawlessly shedding her British accent) is completely oblivious to his
sexual escapades, too busy running the campaign to even care if she did
know. 
Pretty soon, Stanton starts to encounter some pretty sticky situations, one
of which involoves a Gennifer Flowers-like hairdresser who claims that the
two have been carrying on a long-term affair and even says she has the
tapes to prove it! Is she telling the truth, or merely trying to get
publicity? The scene where we find out the truth is one of the film's best
scenes (there is some competition here). 
But even though it may sound like the movie is starring John Travolta and
Emma Thompson, the real star of the show is Adrian Lester as Harry Burton,
a reluctant but loyal political addvisor. Amazingly enough, Lester manages
to carry the movie himself, with Travolta and Thompson taking on what
almost seem like supporting roles. Not that they aren't in it that much,
it's just that it's easier to identify with Harry Burton and his problems
that that of the canidate and his wife's. The film, after all, is seen
through Burton perspective. 
Some other members of Stanton's political team include Billy Bob Thornton
as a scene-stealing Richard Jemmons, the governor's redneck, skirt chasing
strategist, Maura Tireney as the secretary-like Daisy Green and Kathy Bates
as the feisty lesbian Libby Holden, fresh out of a mental hospital. The
only actor who is really wasted in a part is Stacey Edwards (remember her
Oscar-callibar preformance in last year's "In the Company of Men"?) as
Libby's live-in (*cough, cough*) assistent. She's only in a few scenes in
the whole film. 
It's also very fun to try to match certain key characters to their
real-life counterparts. It's only obvious that the Stantons are supposed to
be the President and First Lady, but "Primary Colors" also takes some
clever jabs at such figures as James Carville (represented here by Richard
Jemmons) and Betsey Wright (Libby Holden in the film). 
There's is also alot to be said about Mike Nichols' brilliant direction
(making a nice rebound after the disappointing "Birdcage"). After about
twenty minutes into the movie, I stopped seeing Jack Stanton as Bill
Clinton incarnate, and started looking at him as a real person with real
problems. As much of a screw-up as the guy is, I actually started to care
about him. And any movie that can make you care about a politician has got
to be good. 
Check out Jason's "Filmaholics Anonumous" website at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
Armageddon (1998) * * * (out of four)
Starring Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Ben Affleck, Liv Tyler, Will
Patton, Steve Buscemi, Michael Duncan and Keith David 
Directed by Michael Bay 
Rated PG-13 for planetary disaster, profanity and pillow talk 
Theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1 
Released in 1998 
Running 150 minutes 
Armageddon, in itself, symbolizes everything that is wrong in modern
filmmaking. Stories have been replaced with special effects; character
development gets overshadowed by bad dialogue; plotting consists of a bunch
of shit getting blown up. Armageddon is as stupid, as loud and as shallow
as any movie you'll see come out this summer, or maybe even any other
summer. But I loved every freaking minute of it. 
Believe me, I'm just as shocked as you are. Hell, I don't even know why I
went to see it in the first place. The previews were so annoying that I
predicted this was going to be the worst film of the year, or at least in
the running. I'm sorry, but "Somebody dial 911!!!" isn't quite the tagging
that's going to sell a movie. It isn't too wise either to market the film
using the movie's stupidest lines ("Beam me up Scotty" - yeah, that sure is
great writing...). I mean, let's face it; Armageddon's previews rival The
Truman Show's as being some of the worst of the year. Neither of them even
come close to doing their respective films justice. 
Of course, you all know the story. When the Earth is threatened with total
annihilation via an asteroid the size of Texas, NASA calls in the US's top
oil drillers (!) to go into space (!) and implant a nuclear device
eight-hundred and someodd feet into the asteroid (!). 
In the coarse of all this mayhem, we are introduced to some interesting -
and not so interesting - characters. Belonging to the former group is
Rockhound (Steve Buscemi), a horny little womanizing genius who's always
full of wisecracks, even when flying into space at a huge amount of G's.
Also, there's the always cool-as-hell Billy Bob Thornton as Dan Truman, the
bigwig at NASA who recruits all the drillers. He kind of reminded me of Ed
Harris in Apollo 13, only without the intensity and great lines to deliver.
Then on the flip side of the coin is the tired, contrived character of
Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis, who does the whole movie employing with
annoying accent I can't quite place), the leader of the pack as well as Liv
Tyler and Ben Affleck as the token lovers you must have in any summer
movie. 
Basically, that's about it. As I said, this is hardly a film about plot.
It's another summer blockbuster with plot points that are beyond
unbelievable and dialogue and characters that are mostly completely wooden.
Case in point: NASA doesn't know that there is even an asteroid on it's way
until eighteen days before impact - huh? Another example: at one point in
the movie, two children are playing with toy space shuttles in front of a
poster of Kennedy. How pretentious is that???!!! Want another one? Okay;
before the oil drillers blast off into space, one of them starts singing
"Leaving on a Jet Plane", and soon, all the rest join in. Did Michael Bay
attend the school of sappy filmmaking before he made this picture? 
But naturally, all this sappiness, melodrama and special effects accumulate
to one bitchin' time at the movies. And don't get me wrong - despite all of
the things I found wrong with Armageddon, I still very much enjoyed it. So
even if you don't win one of McDonald's free tickets, it's still definitely
worth checking out. 

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
"Wag the Dog" * * * * 
Starring Dustin Hoffman, Robert DeNiro, Anne Heche, Denis Leary, William H.
Macy, Willie Nelson, Kirsten Dunst, Craig T. Nelson, Woody Harrelson and
James Belushi 
Directed by Barry Levinson 
"Why does a dog wag it's tail? Because a dog is smarter than it's tail. If
the tail was smarter, the tail would wag the dog." 
There is a quality that Barry Levinson's new film "Wag the Dog" possesses
that I have not seen pulled off since Kubrick's "Dr. Strangelove":
brilliant political satire. In all the years that have come and gone since
Kubrick's apocalyptic vision of nuclear war, not one single film has
managed to create satire that deserves comparison. 
I'm sure that by now everyone knows the all-to-familiar (*cough, cough*)
premise of the film: the White House calls in a spin doctor (Robert DeNiro,
in his best performance in years) to play Mr. Fixit when the President
becomes embroiled in a sex scandal involving a much younger woman (again,
*cough, cough*). In turn, DeNiro employs the help of a Hollywood producer
(Dustin Hoffman) to aid him in creating a fake war (oh, excuse me, pageant)
with Albania in order to divert attention from the big cheese's scandal. 
Meanwhile, the President's opponent (a wasted Craig T. Nelson) is planning
to air commercials about the scandal set to the tune "Thank Heaven for
Little Girls". Not good. So they need to get this thing moving fast and
they do so by hiring an array of quirky characters to help move the "war"
along by means of theme songs, catch phrases and fake heroes. 
To say any more would almost be a crime against humanity, so I will leave
it at that. But what ensues is one of the freshest, funniest and just plain
cool flicks to come out of the last decade. The cast puts so much effort
and charm into their roles that, just because of them, it's hard not to
like the movie. I mean, there's just something so cool about hearing
Hoffman quip "That's not a problem." that it just can't be explained. It
has to be seen. 
Just from hearing the plot of the movie, I was curious to see how Levinson
would pull of such an absurd and outrageous plot. Well, he does so.
Brilliantly, I might add. But "Wag the Dog" is far more than a great
political comedy, but it is also a perfectly executed send up of today's
Hollywood that should not (and I hope will not) be forgotten soon. 
However, as fresh and funny as "Wag the Dog" is, it is also extremely
creepy, especially due to the recent spiel involving our president, Mr.
Clinton. It's not all that improbable that this kind of thing could happen.
I'm not saying we're suddenly going to go head-to- head with Iraq or
anything, I'm just stating that it's not all that outragious that someone
could actually do this. Kind of sends a chill up your spine, actually. 
There was a sad shortage of truly great films last year. There are only
about three films that I would consider truly brilliant (this is one of
them, by the way). Now, I haven't seen most of the "elite" films to come
out of 1997 (i.e. "The Ice Storm", "Boogie Nights", "The Sweet Hereafter",
etc.), but I find it rather hard to believe that very many movies could be
better than this is. 
Of course, you know that this isn't going to get the recognition it
deserves come Oscar time. It's too smart and clever for it's own good.
Everyone knows that Hollywood never awards fresh filmmaking. They like to
give the honors to "epic" movies like "The English Patient" and
"Braveheart". I'm not saying that there's anything wrong with those movies;
I thought they were actually pretty good. But Best Picture? No way. That
award should go an original, semi-offbeat film that actually makes us think
about the world we live in. "Wag the Dog" does just that like no movie I've
seen in a long, long time. 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Nosferatu, eine Symphonie des Grauens (1922)
Nosferatu (1922) * * * * (out of four)
Starring Max Shreck, Gustav von Wangenhein, Greta Schroeder, Alexander
Granack and John Gottowt 
Directed by F.M. Maunau 
Unrated, but the equivalent of a PG for intense themes 
Theatrical aspect ratio of 1.33:1 
Released in 1922 
Running 63 minutes 
Hollywood has really done the whole Dracula thing to death (no pun intended
- honest). It's a shame, too, because the good Count was probably the most
frightening out the old B-movie monsters. I mean, come on. Are people
really going to get that scared over a big green guy named Frankenstein
that moves at a speed of five miles per hour? Hell no. And not only was the
idea of a vampire frightening as hell, but it also carried with it a kind
of sensual feeling as well, not commonly associated with horror films. 
And not only has the idea been done too many times, but with the possible
exception of From Dusk 'Till Dawn, has not been done very well lately,
either. This is precisely why it was so much fun for me watching the
original Nosferatu. I got to go back to the times when making movies (even
horror movies) was considered an art form, and not just done to make cash
like nowadays. And that is exactly what this film is; art. I've been a
horror fan since I was eight years old, and to this day I have not seen any
horror film cover the intellectual ground that this film covers. 
Let me backtrack a minute. When I say "intellectual ground", I don't mean
that Nosferatu tackles philosophical questions or anything like that, I
just mean that in order for the film to work the way it was intended to, a
little bit of thinking is involved. With most modern slasher movies like
Friday the 13th and what-not, you can just simply sit back in your chair
and be frightened by the gore that is shown. Those movies could have been
made by a fifth grader with a good makeup kit; movies like this require the
viewer to actually pay attention and ponder what is happening on the
screen. You see, this movie has barely any violence in it and even less
blood or gore. This is a thinking man's slasher flick. 
The "Nosferatu" of the title is Orlock (Max Shreck), a strange, hermit-like
count that, as the film opens, is looking for a new home to buy. He employs
the help of Hutter (Gustav von Wangenhein), a real estate salesman (or
something to that effect) who has a nice home and even a fiancee named
Ellen (Greta Schroeder). Upon orders from his boss, Hutter treks to the
Transylvanian Mountains to visit Orlock's castle and speak to him about his
new home (which just happens to be right next door to Hutter's). The next
morning, he wakes up to find teeth marks on his neck...not really a good
sign. 
He then discovers through some reading that the count is a "Nosferatu", or
vampire, one of the undead that feeds off the blood of living humans. But
by the time he pieces this together, he is too late; Orlock has already
embarked to Hutter's hometown via boat. Will Hutter reach his destination
in time to save his fiancee from the deadly clutches of Count Orlock? 
The character of Orlock is, of course, Dracula. The only only reason his
name was changed was because this was an unauthorized account of Bram
Strocker's novel. Just thought that was an interesting little side note... 
Probably the only way you will get to see this fine film is by purchasing a
copy of Arrow Entertainment's digitally restored cut, now available in
stores. However, this version is quite different than Maunau's original
masterpiece. The movie is now sporting a new soundtrack by band Type
O-Negative and color tinting, much like the 1984 version of Lang's
Metropolis. Now, I really appreciate what Arrow Entertainment is trying to
do here, bringing a classic like this to the attention of a wider audience
that might have otherwise just skipped this one. But alas, I like watching
movies the way they were originally intended to be seen. But that's just my
bag; you may like the newer, more "modern" version better. Either way, I
suggest investing your money in a copy. If you like what they have done
with it, pop it in the VCR and enjoy. If you're like me, just do what I'll
do during future viewings; turn the color all the way down on your
television, hit mute, turn on some Bach or Mozart or whatever, dim the
lights and prepare to view what is truly one of the greatest films ever
made. 

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
You've Got Mail works alot better than it deserves to. In order to make the
film a success, all they had to do was cast two extremely popular and
attractive stars, have them share the screen for about two hours and then
collect the profits. No real acting was involved and there is not an
original or inventive bone in it's body (it's basically a complete re-shoot
of The Shop Around the Corner, only adding a few modern twists).
Essentially, it goes against and defies all concepts of good contemporary
filmmaking. It's overly sentimental and at times terribly mushy, not to
mention very manipulative. But oh, how enjoyable that manipulation is. 
But there must be something other than the casting and manipulation that
makes the movie work as well as it does, because I absolutely hated the
previous Ryan/Hanks teaming, Sleepless in Seattle. It couldn't have been
the directing, because both films were helmed by the same woman. I haven't
quite yet figured out what I liked so much about You've Got Mail, but then
again, is that really important? If you like something so much, why even
question it? 
Again, the storyline is as cliched as they come. Tom Hanks plays Joe Fox,
the insanely likeable owner of a discount book chain and Meg Ryan plays
Kathleen Kelley, the even more insanely likeable proprietor of a family-run
children's book shop called, in a nice homage, The Shop Around the Corner.
Fox and Kelley soon become bitter rivals because the new Fox Books store is
opening up right across the block from the small business. Little do they
know, they are already in love with each other over the internet, only
neither party knows the other person's true identity. 
The rest of the story isn't important because all it does is serve as a
mere backdrop for the two stars to share the screen. Sure, there are some
mildly interesting subplots, but they all fail in comparison to the utter
cuteness of the main relationship. 
All of this, of course, leads up to the predictable climax. But as
foreseeable as the ending is, it's so damn cute and well-done that I doubt
any movie in the entire year contains a scene the evokes as much pure joy
as this part does. When Ryan discovers the true identity of her online
love, I was filled with such, for lack of a better word, happiness that for
the first time all year, I actually left the theater smiling.
*Homepage at http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475
**Complimentary movie ticket courtesy of Valley Cinemas at 
  http://www.movie-tickets.com

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
"Titanic": the two hundred million plus sink-or-swim epic with a boring,
tired, overwrought romance for a storyline. Doesn't sound too promising,
does it? I didn't think so either; I thought it was going to be just
another big-budget bomb in the vein of "Waterworld" or "Speed 2: Cruise
Control". It looked as though the film would sink faster than the ship.
That is, until I read some of the rave reviews this has been getting by the
public and critics alike. So I decided today to see what all the fuss was
about. 
Well, I definently found out. James Cameron's epic love story has got to be
one of the most brilliantly crafted, beautifully filmed and wonderfully
executed movies I have ever seen. And even with all the hype, the drawn-out
story (I mean, honestly, how long can you really watch a romance involving
Leonardo DiCaprio?) and long running time, Cameron has pulled it off. 
At about three hours and fifteen minutes, this is by far the longest flick
I've ever seen at a theater. Usually after about the two-and-a-half hour
mark, you tend to get a little ancy and your ass starts to hurt, but not
here. Oh, no. As soap operay (?) as the love theme may seem, it somehow
manages to completely hold your attention for the full running time. And,
as all truly great films do, it leaves you wanting more. 
Just one of several things that makes the movie so worthwhile is that is
works on many levels, a quality often missing from many modern films. On
the surface, you have the best disaster pic of all time. You also have a
wonderful romance that is the first truly moving pure love story since
"Frankie and Johnny". A little deeper still, you have an excellent example
of the class systems; the difference between the way the rich are treated
and how the less fortunate are. "Titanic" is definently brilliant
filmmaking at it's best. 
The plot revolves around (of course) the sailing of the Titanic, the ship
that was so callously refered to as "unsinkable". But far more intricate to
the story is the relationship between Jack Dawson (Leonardo, in the best
performance of his career thus far), a wandering drifter who won aticket
aboard the Titanic in a poker game. He has barely anything in the world but
is a pretty jolly guy anyway. On the other side of the coin, you've got
Rose (Kate Winslet - shwing!), a poor little rich girl type who has it all;
money, servants, a fiancee, everything. Except happiness. 
Fed up with her miserable existence, Rose contemplates throwing herself off
the ship. Jack saves her and the two instantly fall in love. Only she
doesn't quite know it yet, so she takes some convincing. It doesn't help,
either, that her jerk fiancee (Billy Zane, who deserves more credit for his
performance in this film than he has gotten) is onboard, as is her snobby
mother who needless to say does not take an instant liking to Jack's
advances. 
So the two start a heated love affair and in the middle of it all, the ship
goes down. And that's basically all there is to the plot. But it is the
attention to detail that Cameron puts into the picture that makes that film
so worthwhile. Not to mention the actors, who put so much charisma into
their characters that they help us feel like we are actually on that ship;
that we are not merely watching a movie. They are just as important as the
set pieces (which are amazing enough by themselves. 
"Titanic" is a great film, to be sure, but it is also something more. It is
a piece of art that hits you at just the right places and at just the right
times that it makes you actually become extremely emotionally involved in
it's characters. They hardly ever make movies like this anymore. 
And one other thing. This movie should not be missed in a theater. Because
of the beauty of the cinematography and the sets, you really should see
this on the big screen. Several times, too. It's that great a film. 
Even at it's mild pace (until the last hour, that is), "Titanic" is one of
the rare flicks that carry you away to another place and another time. It's
quite an experience. And though I am of the opinion that the absolute best
film to come out of 1997 was Kevin Smith's beyond-brilliant "Chasing Amy",
I just know that the Academy is too stupid and old-fashioned to get a movie
like that any nominations, let alone Best Picture. So this is the one that
I will be rooting for come Oscar time. In short, see this movie at all
costs. 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
"There's Something About Mary" * * * * (out of four) 
Starring Cameron Diaz, Ben Stiller, Matt Dillon, Lee Evans, Chris Elliot,
Lin Shaye, Jeffrey Tambor, Keith David, W. Earl Brown and Brett Favre 
Rated R for extremely crude sexual humor, profanity and fake nudity 
I feel no hesitation in saying that "There's Something About Mary" is the
best film that I will see all year. From the moment the credits started to
roll at the end of the picture, there was no doubt in my mind that I had
seen a masterpiece that will remain unsurpassed in the remaining months of
1998. It is that good of a film. 
When Gene Siskel said this about "Fargo" only a few months into '96, I
dismissed the notion as ridiculous. How could you possibly know that a film
is so great that nothing you could possibly see in the future could beat
it? But after seeing the Farrelly's hilarious and surprisingly heartfelt
masterwork, I now know what Siskel was talking about. Once in a (very
great) while, a film comes along that is so daring, so brilliant and simply
so enjoyable that at the end, you just want to stand up and cheer. And you
know, at that instant, that you have just experienced something very
special. 
Now for the shocker; "Mary" is the grossest and most disgusting film I have
ever viewed ("Pink Flamingos" obviously notwithstanding). The movie is so
rude and, I guess, inappropriate in nature that I had a hard time sitting
in a theater watching it with my parents (luckily I had seen it before
them, so I could warn the about what they were in for). Forget "Blazing
Saddles", "Animal House" and even the former king of gross-out comedy,
"Monty Python's Meaning of Life"; they were all only preludes to the
Farrelly's assault on the senses. 
In fact, this may even be the funniest film I've ever had the pleasure of
seeing (the only real contender is "Monty Python and the Holy Grail"), and
most certainly the most hilarious to come out all decade. 
But as funny as it is, something also has to be said about the overall
sweetness of "Mary"; it has a huge heart. You see, the Farrelly's are truly
gifted filmmakers. They don't just present you with a string of dick and
fart jokes (although there are plenty to go around). They also, very
wisely, add an unbelievable amount of charisma to the main characters and
actually have them develop as the story progresses. 
It's funny, though. If you just look at an outline of the story, it seems
kind of contrived and predictable. But believe me, it is anything but. Ben
Stiller plays Ted, a very shy and clumsy teenage geek who lusts after the
school babe, Mary (Cameron Diaz). After he sticks up for her retarded
brother, Warren (W. Early Brown - the cameraman, believe it or not, from
"Scream"), his dreams come true when she invites him to the prom. In one of
the film's funniest scenes, something goes wrong (I won't ruin it for those
who know nothing about the film) and Ted is unable to face Mary ever again.
Jump to the present. After years of self-loathing, Ted finally hires
private detective Pat Healy (a suitably slimy Matt Dillon) to track her
down so he can have one last chance at winning the woman he has loved since
high school. Healy finds that Mary is still a full-blown hottie and decides
to try and keep her for himself. 
Admittingly, the basic story line leaves a little to be desired. After all,
with a not-really-all-that-funny premise, how can you sustain laughter for
nearly two hours? Somehow, the Farrelly's pull it off. 
The performances here are also right on target. As Ted, Stiller adds just
the right amount of clumsy charm to make his character not irritating, as
he would normally be, but very lovable. And Cameron Diaz is perfect in her
role for obvious reasons, but the actor who really grabs your attention is
W. Earl Brown as Mary's brother. No other actor has even come close to
playing a mentally retarded man with as much natural ease as Brown displays
here. I know he won't be nominated, but this is the guy who should not be
counted out when it comes time to hand out the Oscar nods in February. As
good as the actors are, though, it's the directors' movie all the way. 
I guarantee that on almost every other top ten list at the end of the year,
you will see the number one space occupied by Steven Spielberg's WWII epic
"Saving Private Ryan". And yes, that is a great film worthy of the
recognition it has been getting. But which is harder; making a great war
film or having your audience laugh so hard that they can't breath for
minutes at a time? I'll let you decide that one for yourself, but this
critic is sticking to his guns. There is just something about "Mary". 
*Find all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Title
Review for Twister (1996)
What in the hell is wrong with conteporary Hollywood? Don't they realize
that almost every single one of their big-budget blockbusters suck?
Obviously not, because they just keep on turning out the same, tired ol'
run of the mill formula flicks. I mean, just look at the last couple years.
This year, we had the latest "Batman" flick. What started out as a
brilliantly realized, stark, gothic series of great films directed by the
master of the macabre himself, Tim Burton, has turned into a franchise.
Then they ditched Burton and Keaton and came out with the sorriest excuse
for an action film I have ever had the misfortune of seeing. Now, they have
a better Batman (George Clooney, by the way), but some of the stupidest
villians in recent memory (though Poisen Ivy was great). Look at the kinds
of lines we got: "Ice to see you. Chill out." C'mon! And how can we forget
"Speed 2: Cruise Control"? They took what is very possibly the greatest
action film in the past ten years and spent, like, 170 million dollars (or
something like that) to make a crap sequel that did about 70 million at the
box office! And then you have the queen of them all: "Twister". 
Okay, don't worry. I'm done ranting and raving about how stupid Hollywood
is and I'm actually going to start talking about the "film". 
"Twister", like I said, is the queen of all crappy summer movies. It has
absolutly no character development, no plot twists (hell, it barely even
has a plot) and basically no script. This is an empty film. And what's sad
is that it doesn't even do what it was meant to do. Some of my favorite
movies are empty films. Just look at the films of Jackie Chan or Bruce Lee.
They have horrible acting and essentially no direction, but they thrilled
the hell out of me. Those are four star flicks. This is a travesty to the
art of film-making. 
Face it: this is not even a fun movie! Even "Independence Day", as bad as
it was, had at least some redeeming qualities. This has nothing. And what's
even more depressing is that they actually could have taken this somewhere
if they had just written a decent script. They FX are fantastic and you
have some of the best actors and actresses working in Hollywood: you've got
Bill Paxton ("One False Move", "Aliens") as the storm chaser turned weather
man; Jamie Gertz (who was great in "Sibling Rivalry") as his new fiance;
and finally Alan Ruck (very under-rated; just look at "Ferris Bueller's Day
Off") as one of the other chasers. With a cast like that, you should at
least have a two-and-a-half to three star movie on your hands. 
Well, Jan De Bont (fresh off of "Speed" - the film, not the drug) screws it
up royaly. I'm not even going to go into plot details 'cause you all know
what it's about and even how it's gonna end. It's that predictible. 
If you are looking for a good action/adventure film to rent tonight, please
look elsewhere. In fact, if you want a good action film, you're going to
have to go off the new release shelf and look into the older film of
yesteryear. That is where you will find the truly great action films:
"Aliens", "Lethal Weapon", "The Killer", "Enter the Dragon", "Jaws" or even
(dare I say it?) "Mortal Kombat". Any of these movies are better than this,
or anything else Hollywood has put out recently. Skip it. 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475
